                              301 of 994 DOCUMENTS

             Copyright © 1993, American Health Lawyers Association,
                              Journal of Health Law

                                   July, 1993

                         Vol. 26, No. 7, HOSPLW Pg. 193

LENGTH: 15669 words

TITLE: Current Topics in Medical Staff Development and Credentialing

AUTHOR: Kevin E. Grady, Alston & Bird, Atlanta, Georgia.  A.B., 1969, Vanderbilt
Univ.; J.D., 1974, Harvard School of Law.

TEXT:

   While the new Clinton administration is focusing on the major issues of
health care reform and controlling health care costs, [n1] hospital boards and
administrators are struggling daily over more mundane issues that cause "brush
fires" to erupt continually at the local hospital level.  Issues such as the
proper mix of physicians on the staff, the need to recruit new physicians, and
the merits of closing medical staffs or specific departments can create serious
conflicts between medical staffs and hospital boards.

   Some of these disputes can be traced to the proliferation of preferred
provider organizations (PPOs), health maintenance organizations (HMOs), and
other managed care arrangements.  Such arrangements emphasize the need to reduce
health care costs by rewarding those providers who render treatment below an
agreed-upon price level and penalizing those providers whose costs exceed those
levels. [n2] The introduction of Diagnostic Related Groups (DRGs) and Resource
Based Relative Value Scales (RBRVS) have forced providers to reduce costs of
treatment or suffer the financial consequences. [n3]

   The economic "squeeze" which the government and third party payers have
imposed on providers has had the particularly unfortunate consequence of
increasing tension between hospitals and physicians over privileging decisions.
This tension has been most visible when hospitals have taken actions to limit or
deny physicians medical staff privileges.

   Hospitals are often caught between the need for economic survival and the
insistence of physicians on their medical staffs that only "quality of care"
concerns can determine the granting or denial of staff privileges.  If hospitals
make decisions which are in any way based on economic criteria, physicians often
raise the cry of "economic credentialing." [n4]

   Privileging decisions can also be complicated by factors other than economic
pressures.  For example, statutes such as the Americans With Disabilities Act
(ADA) [n5] and the Age Discrimination in Employment Act (ADEA) [n6] may affect
privileging decisions.  To add further fuel to the fire, hospital administrators
confront increasing battles between medical specialists over which staff members
should have credentials to perform certain procedures or provide new services at
the hospital. [n7]

   This Article will attempt to address some of the current issues which often
baffle and perplex hospital administrators in the staff privileges area.
Specifically, it will discuss the issue of "economic credentialing," which
undergirds many other issues, such as medical staff development plans, turf
battles, and the offering of new services. [n8] This Article will also discuss
the potential for claims under the ADA and ADEA to create liability for
hospitals in privileging decisions.

   ECONOMIC CREDENTIALING

   "Economic credentialing" is a controversial issue among hospital medical
staffs.  The American Medical Association (AMA) and other medical societies view
the concept very negatively and have gone on record as strongly opposing
privileging or credentialing decisions based on economic factors. [n9]

   For example, the Medical Society of the State of New York recently issued a
formal policy paper opposing the use of economic factors in granting medical
staff privileges. [n10] The policy states: "'Granting and termination of
hospital medical staff privileges is not an arbitrary action.  It requires
medical staff/governing board collaboration and should be based on criteria
related only to clinical competency and patient care." [n11] In an attempted
compromise on the issue, the California Medical Association (CMA) and the
California Association of Hospital and Health Systems (CAHHS) last year approved
a voluntary set of principles governing the practice of economic credentialing
and exclusive contracting. [n12] Throughout the county, physicians have either
resigned from medical staffs over proposed changes in bylaws which they believed
would result in economic credentialing of physicians, or have sued hospitals
which have attempted either to close certain departments or to grant exclusive
contracts based on economic reasons. [n13]

   The above examples demonstrate that economic credentialing can be a divisive
issue between hospitals and physicians, and it is a source of both concern and
litigation in federal and state courts.  The issue can also arise outside the
medical staff privileges context, for example, when HMOs, PPOs, or other managed
care plans exclude physicians from participation. [n14] However, the issue has
been most dramatically raised in the context of medical staff privileges
decisions.

   Definition of Economic Credentialing

   There is no one definition of the term "economic credentialing." Indeed,
commentators have acknowledged the difficulty of defining the term:

   Economic credentialing is particularly difficult to define because the term
is used in different ways.  In a broad sense, economic credentialing is used to
refer to two different approaches for evaluating physicians.  On the one hand,
economic credentialing refers to a system that evaluates physicians based on
explicit costs or charge parameters, and those factors become key elements in
credentialing decisions.  Under such a system, a physician may be required to
generate a certain amount of profit for an institution, or demonstrate that he
or she admits an economically favorable patient mix into the institution as a
condition for retaining staff privileges.

   The other use of economic credentialing involves an evaluation of physicians
based on individual utilization data, which serves to illustrate not only
individual financial issues in a particular physician's practice, but quality of
care issues as well. . . .  Under the second general concept of economic
credentialing, certain utilization factors, which have clear economic
implications, are highlighted in the physician appraisal process.  For example,
physicians who perform excessive numbers of particular procedures or frequently
order tests that have an adverse economic impact on the institution may have
such behavior factored into their credentialing review. [n15]

   One commentator has noted that "physicians are beginning to view exclusive
contracts as a form of economic credentialing, particularly if an exclusive
contract is entered into to improve a hospital's economic position." [n16] The
Medical Society of the State of New York's policy paper on the issue describes
economic credentialing as occurring when the following criteria are analyzed in
awarding clinical privileges: 1) the revenue generated by a physician for a
hospital; 2) patient demographics; 3) physician's membership on other medical
staffs; 4) malpractice risk exposure; and 5) the number of hospital-owned
outpatient services utilized. [n17]

   To some degree, the issue of economic credentialing has become synonymous
with the issue of whether the medical staff of the hospital board controls the
ultimate decision as to who should practice at a particular hospital.  This
tension between the physicians and the hospital board is exemplified by the
debate over whether the hospital should take economic factors into account in
granting and terminating privileges in order to survive in today's competitive
market, or whether physicians should only be deprived of staff privileges based
on quality of care issues. [n18]

   The AMA has gone on record as opposing the use of economic credentialing by
hospital boards and has adopted a policy wit respect to exclusive contracts at
hospitals. [n19] That policy states that the medical staff should review and
make recommendations to the governing body regarding quality of care issues
related to exclusive contract arrangements, prior to the making of any decision,
in the following situations: 1) the decision to execute an exclusive contract in
a previously open department or service; 2) the decision to renew or otherwise
modify an exclusive contract in a particular department or service; and 3) the
decision to terminate an exclusive contract in a particular department or
service. [n20]

   Various state medical associations have propounded or sponsored "model"
medical staff bylaws which incorporate the AMA's opposition to economic
credentialing. [n21] At least one state medical association's model bylaws would
prohibit the denial or grant of clinical privileges based solely or primarily on
economic criteria that do not related to clinical qualifications, professional
responsibility, or quality of care. [n22]

   Despite the AMA's and state medical associations' opposition to economic
credentialing, at least one commentator has observed that a hospital board may
have a fiduciary obligation to engage in economic credentialing.

   Not only does a board have the legal authority to introduce economic
evaluations into credentialing, an argument could be made that it has a mandate
to do so.  In institutions where data systems are in place that generate
physician clinical and financial profiles, a board will have the ability to make
the necessary correlations required for a program of economic credentialing.  As
the fiscal fiduciary of a hospital, a board confronted with data showing that a
given practitioner's hospital practice is financially out of line with
institutional business objectives may be required to act.  Although the
governing entity will be inclined to delegate physician economic evaluation to
the medical staff, as in credentialing generally, the ultimate responsibility
rests with the governing entity. [n23]

   While the debate continues over the merits of economic credentialing, the
fact remains that numerous economic issues affect staff privilege decisions.
Some factors, obviously, are more controversial than others.

   The Types of Factors Involved In Economic Credentialing

   If economic credentialing is used in its broadest sense, then every staff
privilege decision which is determined primarily by economic factors will be
viewed as a form of economic credentialing.  For example, an exclusive contract
with a hospital-based provider may prevent any unaffiliated physician from
obtaining staff privileges.  Furthermore, certain hospital contracts can provide
one group of physicians with specific advantages, such as being the primary
provider of certain hospital-based services.  This arrangement may have a
negative impact on other staff members who feel restricted in exercising their
privileges as they desire, or who derive less economic value from their
privileges. [n24]

   In addition to hospital contractual arrangements which may affect
credentialing decisions, other economic criteria, such as the need to have
certain minimum amounts of malpractice coverage, also may influence the
credentialing process. [n25] Other economic factors have resulted from the
increased information available from physician profiles based on DRGs, which can
inform a hospital about: 1) a physician's type of admissions, 2) average length
of stay of patients, 3) diagnosis, 4) charges, and 5) hospital reimbursement.
[n26]

   Those who oppose economic credentialing, such as the California Medical
Association (CMA), have objected to considering factors such as DRG review,
revenue per physician, admission rates, payer mix, and community need for a
particular service. [n27] Nevertheless, even the CMA acknowledges certain
economic indicators may have an appropriate relationship to quality of care so
that they could be used in the credentialing process, such as comparing the
amount of resources used by physicians, the number of tests ordered, the use of
consultants/referrals, and DRG outliers. [n28]

   LITIGATION INVOLVING ECONOMIC CREDENTIALING

   Although the term economic credentialing has been addressed directly in
numerous articles, the federal and state courts have not generally used the term
in deciding physician challenges to staff privilege decisions.

   The case of Rosenblum v. Tallahassee Regional Medical Center [n29] has
received a tremendous amount of publicity as the first case in which a court has
upheld a hospital's use of economic credentialing in deciding to deny
privileges. [n30] In that case, a Florida state trial court in 1992 upheld a
hospital's decision to deny privileges to a cardiac surgeon because he was head
of the department at a competing hospital.  In granting summary judgment to the
hospital defendants, the court specifically held that under Florida law a
hospital could properly take into account the concept of economic credentialing.
The court stated:

   Taken in a generic sense, I think that is a valid consideration, as
illustrated by one of the analogies I used earlier.  And that is, if we have a
hospital with a very highly qualified physician in a rare specialty and one that
is rarely used and which will be most costly to equip and he wants medical
privileges extended for that purpose, then I think it is appropriate that,
regardless of medical qualifications, that the governing board be able to take
into consideration the economic costs to establish that department.  And they
could deny privileges in that field because to grant them would create the
concomitant requirement that the department be established, equipped and the
like. [n31]

   The court went on to hold that the hospital had a valid economic basis for
denying privileges based on the fact that the physician was the program chairman
and developer of a heart program at a competing hospital in Tallahassee. [n32]

   Because Rosenblum was a trial court decision, it may have little precedential
effect outside its immediate area.  Nevertheless, numerous other federal and
state court cases have analyzed credentialing decisions based on economic
factors without using the term economic credentialing. [n33] In those cases
physicians or other providers have challenged denial or restriction of
privileges because of exclusive contracts, closed medical staffs, or
credentialing decisions allegedly based on economic criteria. [n34] Normally,
physicians who challenge such decisions have alleged violations of federal
antitrust statutes. [n35] Aggrieved physicians also commonly allege claims under
42 U.S.C. § 1983 for denial of due process, [n36] as well as various state law
claims for breach of contract, tortious interference with business and
professional relations, tortious interference with contract, intentional
infliction of emotional distress, and violations of state-specific statutes
regulating hospitals. [n37]

   Another cause for concern is the potential for economic credentialing to
constitute a violation of Medicare and Medicaid Fraud and Abuse prohibitions.
[n38] For example, the Office of Inspector General (OIG) issued a Management
Advisory Report in 1991, which identified several suspect financial
relationships between hospitals and hospital-based physicians, such as contracts
requiring physicians to split part of their income with hospitals, to pay more
than fair market value for services provided by hospitals, or to receive less
than fair market value for services rendered to hospitals. [n39]

   In examining how the courts have analyzed challenges to economically
motivated privileging decisions by hospitals, this Article will discuss
challenges under federal antitrust laws, as well as challenges based upon
federal due process and state breach of contract and tort claims.  In ruling on
these, federal courts have been somewhat more consistent than state courts in
upholding the hospitals' decisions.

   Challenges Under The Federal Antitrust Laws

   Many claims have arisen from physicians' challenging exclusive hospital
contracts for hospital-based services, such as radiology, anesthesiology,
pathology, and emergency room services. [n40] Most physicians who have brought
such claims have done so under sections 1 and 2 of the Sherman Act, alleging
that the contracts constitute illegal tying arrangements, group boycotts,
unlawful exclusive dealing arrangements, monopolization, an attempt to
monopolize, or conspiracy to monopolize the services being provided by the
contract provider. [n41]

   Thus far most such challenges have been unsuccessful, primarily because of
the inability of the plaintiffs to convince the courts to review their claims
under a per se illegal standard of analysis. [n42] Instead, most courts have
analyzed staff privilege cases under the traditional "rule of reason analysis"
and have found that the contracts in question generally have not had a
sufficient adverse effect on competition to be viewed as unlawful. [n43]

   Exclusive Hospital Contracts

   The leading case analyzing the legality of an exclusive hospital contract is
Jefferson parish Hospital Dist. No. 2 v. Hyde. [n44] There, the Supreme Court
held that an exclusive contract for providing anesthesia services at one of
several hospitals in the New Orleans area did not constitute a per se illegal
tying arrangement, and did not unreasonably restrain trade under a rule of
reason analysis.  The Court emphasized that the hospital attracted approximately
30 percent of the residents in the particular parish, which meant that over 70
percent of the patients living in the hospital's service area went to other
hospitals.  A majority of the Court was willing to apply a per se rule of
illegality to an exclusive hospital-based contract if the hospital, which "tied"
the use of the hospital's operating rooms to the use of anesthesia services, had
substantial market power in the typing product.  Nevertheless the Court
unanimously held that because a substantial majority of the residents chose not
to use the hospital, the hospital did not have the kind of dominant market
position that would justify a per se analysis. [n45]

   The Court went on to note that the principal impact of the exclusive contract
was to limit the choice of anesthesiologists at the hospital to those associated
with the holder of the exclusive contract:

   Even if Roux did not have an exclusive contract, the range of alternatives
open to the patient would be severely limited by the nature of the transaction
and the hospital's unquestioned right to exercise some control over the identity
and the number of doctors to whom it accords staff privileges.  If respondent is
admitted to the staff of East Jefferson, the range of choice will be enlarged
from four to five doctors, but the most significant restraints on the patient's
freedom to select a specific anesthesiologist will nevertheless remain.  Without
a showing of actual adverse effect on competiton, respondent cannot make out a
case under the antitrust laws, and no such showing has been made.

   . . . It may well be true that the contract made it necessary for Dr. Hyde
and others to practice elsewhere, rather than at East Jefferson.  But there has
been no showing that the market as a whole has been affected at all by the
contract. [n46]

   Decisions By Lower Federal Courts

   Lower court decisions have consistently relied on Hyde in upholding exclusive
contracts, even when such contracts have been entered into because of economic
considerations. [n47] Indeed, lower courts have acknowledged the valid economic
concerns of hospitals in executing exclusive contracts. [n48]

   The South Carolina federal district court decision in Drs. Steur & Latham v.
National Medical Enterprises [n49] provides a good overview of the issues raised
in a challenge to a hospital's decision to replace an exclusive hospital
provider.  In that case, the hospital terminated the contract of a pathologist
group which had been at the hospital for twenty-three years, and replaced it
with another exclusive group.  The hospital offered the plaintiffs a new
contract with different terms in order to improve the accountability of the
pathology department and enhance risk management, as well as to save costs for
the hospital.  However, the plaintiffs rejected the contract.  The record
indicated that the new contract entered into with the substitute provider was
"at a cost to the hospital substantially below both the amount previously paid
to plaintiffs and the figure proposed by plaintiffs during the negotiations
which preceded their nonrenewal." [n50] The plaintiffs were permitted to retain
their general staff privileges, but they apparently provided no further
pathology services within the hospital, even though they maintained a
nonhospital-based laboratory adjacent to the hospital where they performed
pathology work. [n51]

   In rejecting the plaintiffs' antitrust challenges under sections 1 and 2 of
the Sherman Act, the court emphasized that "[m]erely changing exclusive
contractors . . . cannot constitute a violation of the antitrust laws." [n52]
The court rejected the argument that the new contract constituted an illegal
tying arrangement, for two reasons: 1) pathology services were not offered
independently from general hospital inpatient services, and, therefore, there
were not the requisite two services for an illegal tying arrangement; and 2) the
hospital did not share or have any economic interest in the revenues produced by
the pathologists.  The court held, however, that even if there had been the
requisite two services, and the hospital had shared in the fees of the new
radiologist, there would have been no illegal tying arrangement because the
relevant market could not be limited simply to the county in which the hospital
was located.  The court stressed the economic reality that other hospitals
competed with the defendant hospital, which had a 60 percent market share of
patients from its county.  When viewed in the context of the market share of all
hospitals in which the defendant competed, the court concluded the hospital had
no market power and therefore had no power or ability to reduce competition.
[n53]

   With respect to the plaintiff's exclusive dealing claim, the court emphasized
that the appropriate inquiry was whether competition in the market for the
supply of pathology services was substantially impaired by the exclusive
contract.  The court noted that there was no foreclosure of the plaintiff's
ability to pursue opportunities at hospitals elsewhere.  The court emphasized
that there was nothing to prevent the plaintiffs from bidding from the pathology
contract at the hospital since it was terminable by either party on ninety days'
notice and the hospital could cancel the contract if another pathology provider
made a better bid.  Because the record reflected many opportunities for
pathologists in hospitals nationwide, the mere foreclosure from practicing at a
single hospital was of no competitive significance. [n54]

   With respect to plaintiffs' claim that the defendant had engaged in an
illegal group boycott, the court stressed the hospital had acted unilaterally in
deciding not to renew the plaintiffs' agreement and in deciding to enter into a
new agreement.  The court noted none of the members of the medical staff or
board of directors competed with plaintiffs, and there was no evidence anyone
was motivated by a desire to secure a competitive advantage over or to inflict
competitive injury upon plaintiffs.  The court was unwilling to conclude that
merely because a new radiologist had signed the contract, he had entered into a
illegal conspiracy.  The absence of evidence of a conspiracy similarly supported
summary judgment on the group boycott claim. [n55]

   Furthermore, the court granted summary judgment on plaintiffs' section 2
claims based on finding the relevant market to be the market for professional
pathology services throughout the country.  Because the hospital had to
substantial market power, plaintiffs' claim for attempted monopolization and
conspiracy to monopolize failed because the hospital board had acted
unilaterally in entering into the contract. [n56]

   Other courts which have confronted the issue of antitrust challenges to
exclusive contracts have generally upheld such contracts based on the inability
of the plaintiff to show any overall adverse effect on competition. [n57]

   Closing the Medical Staff or Particular Department

   In addition to physicians challenging exclusive contracts when they are
denied privileges, physicians who are on the staff when a hospital decides to
"close" a particular department and who are not part of the favored group have
also filed suit challenging the decision on antitrust grounds. [n58] From an
antitrust standpoint, analyzing the issues involved in "closing" a medical staff
or a medical department is very similar to analyzing the legality of an
exclusive contract.  One recent case which illustrates this point is Bellam v.
Clayton County Hospital Authority. [n59] There, a hospital decided to close its
anesthesia department by entering into an exclusive contract with one of its
staff members to provide all anesthesia services.  The decision to "close" the
anesthesia department was the result of several years' discussion, open meetings
among the anesthesiologists and members of the board, and site visits by
representatives of the American Society of Anesthesiologists (ASA). [n60]

   After the board made its decision, the two anesthesiologists who were not
affiliated with the contract group filed suit to enjoin the implementation of
the contract.  In reviewing the antitrust claims, the court denied the
injunction, noting there was no evidence of any overall adverse competitive
effect merely because two physicians would now be forced to find practice
opportunities elsewhere. [n61] The personal adverse effect claimed by the two
physicians was insufficient under the Supreme Court's analysis in Hyde. Also,
the court noted the "plaintiffs [have] offered no evidence to refute the
defendants'contention that the proper market in this case included examination
of both the alternatives available to consumers of hospital services and the
alternatives to anesthesiologists seeking employment at the hospital." [n62] The
court further noted the "plaintiffs' own past practice in several states
indicates the market for anesthesiologists is very broad." [n63] However, even
if the market had been limited simply to consumers of hospital services in the
county in which the hospital was located, the court doubted the plaintiff could
ever show any substantial adverse effect. [n64]

   Federal Due Process Challenges

   If the hospital's decision to "close" a department or to replace an exclusive
provider is made without granting a hearing under the medical staff bylaws to
the adversely affected physicians, those physicians will often challenge a
public hospital's decision under 42 U.S.C. § 1983 on the theory that they were
denied due process. [n65] In rejecting such claims, the courts have often
emphasized the economic motivation of the hospital, and found that the action in
question was rationally related to a legitimate interest. [n66]

   For example, in Mays v. Hospital Authority, [n67] the hospital terminated an
exclusive arrangement with its radiologist because of concerns about losses in
the department.  Although the former exclusive provider remained on the staff of
give "second readings," and had other admitting privileges, he challenged the
hospital's decision. [n68] The court denied the physician's request for a
preliminary injunction and granted summary judgment on the plaintiff's due
process claims.  In doing so, the district court noted "that the exclusive
contact had brought the radiology department closer to solvency, and in that
sense, serves the public interest." [n69] The court emphasized that the
hospital's justification for entering into a new exclusive contract was to
"reduce the operating losses of the Radiology Department." [n70] The court went
on to hold:

   The hospital has a legitimate interest in its financial well-being, and the
exclusive contract that permits it to recoup more revenues from the operation of
the Radiology Department is rationally related to that interest.  Any mode of
operating the Radiology Department could be expected to have an adverse effect
on some parties.  The Constitution does not authorize the court to invalidate
the mode the hospital has chosen, simply because it may have some undesirable
repercussions. [n71]

   The court also recognized the exclusive contract was an appropriate exercise
of the Hospital Authority's "wide discretion to administer its facilities and to
regulate the activities of its staff in order to promote optimal patient care
and to assure the hospital's financial well-being." [n72] The Mays case
demonstrates the courts' recognition that hospitals can enter into exclusive
contracts of further their economic interest, such as to reduce operating
losses, and such motives are legitimate and within the discretion of the
hospital in administering its facilities and regulating the activities of its
staff.

   The success of a physician's due process challenge may hinge on whether the
physician remains on the staff.  If the hospital allows the physician to retain
privileges, but simply limits the exercise of those privileges, federal courts
have been generally reluctant to find a due process violation. [n73] The
distinction which the courts have drawn is the difference between a hospital's
"administrative" decision, which may be based on economic considerations, and a
hospital's "corrective" decision, which may stigmatize the physician and give
rise to claims for a due process hearing under the bylaws. [n74]

   In Faucher v. Rodziwiecz, [n75] the Eleventh Circuit upheld judgment in favor
of a hospital which had altered its contractual arrangements to provide
anesthesia services at the hospital.  The previous physician had refused to
execute a new contract suitable to the hospital, refusing to indemnify the
hospital in case of her negligence and refusing to make her privileges
contingent on the continuation of the contract, so the hospital contracted with
a new physician. [n76] The new physician then implemented a policy under which
members of the medical staff could request the prior physician, but needed to do
so at least twenty-four hours in advance.  The former physician claimed that
this arrangement severely restricted her ability to fully utilize her
privileges, and filed suit under 42 U.S.C. § 1983. [n77]

   In upholding the hospital's decision, the court noted the plaintiff's
privileges had never been terminated or even suspended, but were simply no
longer as valuable as before.  The court refused to hold that any diminution of
the "economic value of her medical staff privileges" was a protected property
interest. [n78] The court went on to note that the plaintiff had decided not to
utilize the hospital's internal appeals procedure and determined the
availability of that procedure fully protected her constitutional rights to
procedural due process. [n79]

   Other courts have also rejected the argument that the lessening of value of
staff privileges gives rise to a due process challenge. [n80] Indeed, these
courts have held that "administrative" decisions by hospitals do not require due
process hearings under the medical staff bylaws. [n81] For example, in Engelstad
v. Virginia Municipal Hospital, [n82] the court affirmed judgment for a hospital
which had terminated a physician as director of the pathology department but had
not terminated his privileges.  The court held termination of his position did
not constitute a reduction or termination of privileges sufficient to trigger a
due process hearing under the hospital bylaws. [n83]

   Plaintiff contended the termination of his director's position had the
practical effect of making his staff privileges meaningless and, therefore,
those privileges meaningless and, therefore, those privileges had been reduced
or terminated, triggering the procedural requirements set forth in the bylaws.
In rejecting this argument, the Eighth Circuit noted:

   Staff privileges do not establish an employment contract with the hospital.
Nor do they guarantee a physician that his authorized practice in the hospital
will have a particular economic value. . . .  Finally, the use a physician makes
of his staff privileges may be incidentally affected by a host of hospital
administrative decisions, wholly unconnected to the doctor's professional
competence or ethics.  for instance, the hospital may decide, for economic
reasons, that it will no longer engage in a particular medical procedure, such
as heart transplants.  While the practical effect of this decision may decrease
the income of a heart surgeon with staff privileges, the hospital has not
thereby terminated or reduced his privileges under the bylaws. [n84]

   The court emphasized that the medical staff

   bylaws' procedural requirements were intended only to cover cases where a
doctor's privileges have been reduced or terminated, which is typically the
result of complaints regarding the physician's professional competence or
ethical behavior.  Those procedures were not intended to cover cases, like the
present one, where the use a doctor can make of his staff privileges has been
incidentally affected by the hospital's administrative decision to terminate a
personal service contract with the hospital. [n85]

   The court concluded the plaintiff was basically asking that the court confer
upon him

   a tenured position as director of pathology which could be terminated only
for cause after a due process hearing.  Not only would this be at odds with the
terms of the parties' oral contract, a contract that was clearly terminable at
will, but is would also seriously undermine that hospital's flexibility in
making essentially administrative decisions.  The choice of a department head is
largely an administrative function.  The hospital administrator's discretion in
discharging this function is generally regarded as essential to the proper and
efficient operation of the hospital.  The decision to terminate a director's
contact is frequently based upon organizational factors having nothing to do
with the director's competence to practice his medical profession.  For example,
the hospital may decide to contract with a group of pathologists, rather than
one individual.  Also, changes in medical science may make some department
directorships obsolete.  Finally, as was apparently the case here, the hospital
administration may decide that it can no longer effectively work with a
particular department head due to conflicting ideas about the way the department
should operate.  It would seem that the hospital should have the discretion to
make this decision without affording the aggrieved director the panoply of due
process protections applicable where doctor's staff privileges have been reduced
or terminated because of alleged professional incompetence or unethical
behavior. [n86]

   Similarly, in Bellam v. Clayton County Hospital Authority [n87] the court
held that the anesthesiologists who were not part of the new contract group had
no due process claims because their medical staff privileges had not been
terminated or withdrawn.  The court held that where the defendant's conduct in
closing a department was not predicated upon any allegation or finding
concerning competance of the plaintiffs, then this type of noncorrective action
was "an administrative decision," which is "necessarily afforded wide latitude
to effectuate the proper and efficient operation of the hospital." [n88]

   The court noted that even if it were assumed plaintiffs were entitled to some
due process protection pursuant to the bylaws, the due process they received had
met the minimum standards required under the Constitution. [n89] The court
pointed out that "plaintiffs were fully informed of the Authority's position,"
had an opportunity to present their opposition to the decision to close the
department, and "had ample opportunity to work with the administration and
Authority to effectuate a solution to the problems of the Anesthesiology
Department before the Authority took the action complained of. [n90]

   State Court Challenges

   In addition to federal antitrust and due process challenges to exclusive
contracts or decisions to close hospital departments or staffs, there have also
been numerous state court decisions. [n91] In these case, the plaintiffs have
usually alleged due process or breach of contract violations or tortious
interference with contractual or business relations. [n92] Unfortunately, not
all state court decisions on this subject have reached the same result. [n93]

   Closing Medical Staffs or Departments

   One of the earlier state cases to recognize the economic justification for
closing a department was Datillo v. Tucson General Hospital. [n94] There, are
Arizona Court of Appeals upheld a hospital's grant of an exclusive arrangement
to provide nuclear medicine services at the hospital.  In rejecting a challenge
by an internist who was denied privileges in nuclear medicine, the court found
the testimony at trial justified a directed verdict for the defendants. [n95]
The court emphasized the testimony that exclusive contracts in nuclear medicine
provided many benefits, including the ability to permit the department to
"operate more economically." [n96]

   Another state court decision to address this issue was Lewin v. St. Joseph
Hospital of Orange County, [n97] where the court upheld a private hospital's
decision to operate the hospital's hemodialysis facility on a "closed staff"
basis.  The hospital arranged for an exclusive contract with a group to provide
the services, and a physician who subsequently was denied privileges filed suit.

   The court held that the standard for reviewing the hospital's decisions was
whether the decision was "in the best interest of good patient care and sound
administration of the hospital." [n98] The court noted the decision was made
following extensive review of the issue and after a hearing before the executive
committee of the medical staff. [n99] the court observed that the medical staff
executive committee and the Board had made a policy decision that the closed
staff method "would provide the best patient care at the lowest cost consistent
with sound hospital administration." [n100] In making its decision, the court
emphasized the closed staff would enhance efficiency of operation and make
scheduling easier.  Other California state court decisions have reached similar
conclusions when confronted with challenges to exclusive contracts. [n101]

   Not all state court have upheld closure decisions. [n102] The New Jersey
Supreme Court, in Desai v. St. Barnabus Medical Center, [n103] reviewed a
challenge to a hospital's closed staff policy which the hospital had adopted in
response to perceived bed overcrowding and overutilization of the hospital's
resources.  The purpose was to limit, but not completely close, the hospital
staff.  Under the hospital's policy, a physician applying for privileges would
be approved only if he was professionally qualified and satisfied one or more of
six criteria:

   1) there was need for additional physician coverage in the relevant
department;

   2) hospital's facilities were available;

   3) the applicant possessed some special expertise; or

   4) engaged in a specialty not represented at the hospital;

   5) the applicant did not have privileges at any other area hospital and

   6) [the applicant] was joining the medical practice of a current member of
the hospital medical staff. [n104]

   The court recognized the ability of a hospital to make such a judgment,
provided the hospital's decision is "exercised reasonably for the public good"
and "genuinely [serves] public-health objectives, which include the needs of
patients, particularly the reasonable opportunity to select physicians and to
have adequate access to hospital facilities." [n105] The court stated that a
hospital policy decision which "reasonably serves an evident public-health
purpose . . . will be sustained, even though it may have a discriminatory
effect." [n106]

   The court determined the closed-staff policy, including most of the various
exemptions to it, was valid.  However, the court invalidated the exception that
permitted favorable consideration to those who become associated with a current
member of the medical staff on the grounds that it did not genuinely serve a
public-health objective and was discriminatory in its application. [n107]

   The court observed the most important factor governing the grant of
privileges was whether an applicant was associated with a current staff member.
[n108] The hospital argued that such an exception furthered the public health
objectives of the hospital because physicians joining staff members would "be
able to help cover the patients of those doctors with existing staff privileges,
and their admission would not have an adverse effect on the hospital's occupancy
or utilization rate, since they are unlikely to require many new patient
admissions to the hospital." [n109] The court rejected this argument and
concluded the hospital had failed to introduce sufficient evidence "to
demonstrate a public health objective genuinely served by the exception." [n110]
The court emphasized the purpose of the exception was based on

   pure supposition, with the hospital offering no data, competent evidence, or
other reliable information to support its rationale.  There was no demonstration
as to the regularity of doctors in the same private practice covering each
other's patients; the hospital failed to show that doctors in the
gastroenterology section could not arrange to cover for one another in the case
of an emergency.  It offered no information to support its position that new
doctors, by joining the existing practices of current medical staff members,
would not continue to increase the number of patients seeking access to the
hospital.  These informational deficiencies render insufficient the
public-health purpose urged by the hospital in support of its exception that
permits admission-by-association.  We are thus left only with the discriminatory
feature of this exception, with no public-health palliative advanced to blunt
its invidious effect. [n111]

   Similarly, in Berman v. Valley Hospital, [n112] a case decided the same day
as Desai, the New Jersey Supreme Court invalidated another restriction by a
hospital to prevent overcrowding at its facility.  The hospital had adopted a
policy that medical staff admissions be limited to physicians who had not been
in private practice for more than two years in the hospital service area, or who
met a predetermined need for a specialty.  At the time the hospital adopted this
policy, its occupancy rate had reached 89 percent, and the number of physicians
on its medical staff had risen from 172 to 260 in nine years.

   The court was satisfied that the hospital had adopted the restrictive staff
admissions policy in the regular and normal course of conducting its affairs.
Even though the moratorium was created suddenly, the decision was followed by
the creation of a committee to study and make recommendations as to a permanent
policy that would ameliorate the overutilization of the hospital's facilities
and services.  The committee gathered and analyzed relevant statistical data,
contacted other institutions using closed-staff facilities, and studiously
considered each of the four different proposals.  Only after this deliberative
process did the hospital adopt its staff admissions policy.

   The court acknowledged the fact of overcrowding at the hospital and the
potential adverse effect on the quality of care because of such overcrowding.
Also, the court recognized the hospital's decision was supported to some extent
by statistics showing the direct correlation between the number of physicians on
staff and the rate of admissions of patients.  Furthermore, the court
acknowledged the restriction had been successful in stabilizing bed occupancy
rates, which remained below 90 percent.

   Despite the effectiveness of the closed-staff policy, the court invalidated
the policy, which it considered

   too vague and attenuated in relation to its professed health-care objective
involving high-quality medical education.  While there may be some logical or
facile appeal in this standard, it lacks any empirical or academic support.  The
two-year practice restriction is not the by-product of any extensive studies or
background research.  The particular program finds no support in experience,
sound or controlled experimentation, reliable precedent, or even common sense. .
. .  Nor did the hospital produce any competent authority or expert who has
recommended this solution to meet a hospital's capacity problem. [n113]

   The court concluded the hospital had failed to marshall adequate information
to demonstrate that its particular restrictive admissions policy was
sufficiently related to a genuine and legitimate health care objective.
Instead, the court observed the policy was not justified and appeared in most
respects to be arbitrary.

   One lesson from the Berman and Desai cases may be that if the hospitals had
been able to base their decisions on some type of empirical data or outside
expert advice supporting the decision to close the staffs in the manner adopted
by the hospitals, their decisions might have been reviewed more favorably by the
courts.  The key in any decision to close a medical staff or a hospital
department is to demonstrate that the policy decision is sufficiently related to
a genuine and legitimate health care objective.

   Changing Exclusive Contract Providers

   Some hospital-based providers have filed state court challenges to decisions
by hospitals to change exclusive providers. [n114] The state courts have
generally provided a more favorable forum for plaintiffs than have federal
courts that have analyzed these decisions on federal antitrust or due process
grounds. [n115] In state courts, the replaced physicians have argued that they
cannot be replaced without a due process hearing guaranteed by the bylaws, which
the physicians often allege constitute an enforceable contract between the
physicians and the hospital. [n116]

   One of the most notable cases in this regard is Lewisburg Community Hospital
v. Alfredson. [n117] In this case, the Tennessee Supreme Court held that a
hospital could not terminate the contract of its radiologist, replace him with
another radiologist, and prevent the plaintiff from having access to the
radiology department without first providing him with the due process rights
guaranteed under the bylaws.  The court held that the bylaws of the medical
staff constituted an enforceable contract.  However, even in that case, the
Tennessee Supreme Court recognized that the hospital and the plaintiff could
have legally agreed in the original contract that the plaintiff's privileges
terminated upon the termination of the contract. [n118] One of the publicized
aspects of the Alfredson decision was its holding that the medical staff bylaws
constituted an enforceable contract between the physician and the hospital.
Other courts have reached similar conclusions. [n119]

   Not all states, however, recognized that the medical staff bylaws constitute
a contract. [n120] The recent Georgia Court of Appeals decision in St. Mary's
Hospital of Athens v. Radiology Professional Corporation [n121] is a case in
point.  In that case, the hospital and its contract radiologist had a
long-standing disagreement over how the radiology department should be run and
whether the hospital could terminate the contract, which would prevent the
radiologist thereafter from exercising privileges.  Indeed, the hospital filed a
declaratory judgment action to establish its right to do so; the radiologist
counterclaimed for breach of contract and various tort claims.  While this
action was pending, the radiologist lost several employees and informed the
hospital he could not provide the level of service required.  The hospital then
notified the radiologist the contract would be terminated and his privileges
revoked.

   The trial court denied the radiologist's claim for a preliminary injunction,
and also denied the hospital's summary judgment motion on the physician's
counterclaims on appeal.  The Georgia Court of Appeals to the hospital on
virtually all of the physician's counterclaims.  The court specifically rejected
his claim that the medical staff bylaws constituted a contract.  The court,
instead, held that because hospitals have the authority to establish and review
rules and regulations governing the appointment of physicians and medical staff,
"medical staff bylaws alone do not create any contractual right to continuation
of staff privileges.  Indeed, hospitals are entitled to change the staff bylaws
or the terms of appointment even if that act results in the termination of a
physician's staff privileges." [n122] The court agreed that the hospital had the
authority to establish an exclusive relationship with physicians in a given
specialty or area of practice, and that this authority included the concomitant
right to terminate staff privileges to maintain this exclusivity.  However, the
court went onto hold that to ensure this right, the hospital must provide for it
either in the bylaws or in a contract with the individual physician. [n123]

   Some courts have held that, even if the bylaws do not constitute a contract,
the physician nevertheless may have a claim for an injunction to enforce the
bylaws, or may have some type of inchoate action in tort against the hospital
for breach of a legal duty to follow existing bylaws. [n124]

   The issue of whether medical staff bylaws constitute a contract is one that
has been hotly debated.  The American Medical Association and American College
of Radiology have argued in favor of this position as amici on behalf of the
plaintiffs in both the Alfredson and St. Mary's cases. [n125] Nevertheless, the
ultimate freedom of a hospital to terminate or change existing hospital-based
providers is unlikely to rise or fall on whether the bylaws constitute a
contract.  Instead, a court's review of a decision to change exclusive providers
likely will rest on the ability of the hospital to convince the court that this
type of "administrative action" does not give rise to the panoply of due process
requirements set forth in the medial staff bylaws. [n126]

   A recent case on this point is the Supreme Court of Maine's decision in
Bartley v. Eastern Maine Medical Center. [n127] There, the hospital, in order to
reduce its operating expenses, terminated its contract with its emergency room
group after unsuccessfully attempting to negotiate an alternative compensation
arrangement.  The hospital subsequently negotiated a more favorable compensation
arrangement with a new group and notified the plaintiffs they could no longer
work in the emergency department unless they negotiated employment contracts
with the new provider.  The hospital did not terminate the physicians' staff
privileges, but merely prevented their exercising the privileges in the
emergency room.  The plaintiffs filed suit claiming that the approval of their
staff privileges under the bylaws established a contract with the hospital, and
that the hospital had breached that contract when it required them to enter into
a separate employment agreement in order to exercise their privileges in the
emergency department.

   Even though the Maine Supreme court held the bylaws can constitute an
enforceable contract, the court emphasized that the bylaws stated the medical
staff assumed their responsibilities" 'subject to the authority of the hospital
board of trustee'", and that the bylaws were subject to the board's authority.
[n128] The court went on to distinguish between a physician's having staff
privileges, which merely signifies the physician is qualified to practice at the
hospital, and being able to exercise those privileges.  The court also noted
that there was a distinction between the types of physicians who are granted
privileges: general practitioners, for whom the granting of staff privileges may
be all that is necessary for the physicians to treat patients at the hospital,
and hospital-based physicians, such as emergency room physicians, for whom
additional arrangements with the hospital may be required.

   The court held that the hospital's board, acting through its president and
medical director, had the authority to manage all the affairs of the hospital,
which would include decisions on how to operate individual departments in order
to best care for patients and promote community health.  The court went on to
recognize "[the] cost of such care and promotion of community health is vitally
important to the community and a legitimate concern for the board." [n129] the
court noted that the hospital's decision was based on the need to significantly
reduce costs, and held that the plaintiffs were not entitled to invoke the
notice and hearing provisions of the bylaws, which were available only to
physicians facing "major corrective action.'" [n130] The court emphasized that
the hospital had never suggested the professional conduct of any of the
plaintiffs was unacceptable and had not recommended that their privileges be
reduced.  Therefore, the court concluded the notice and hearing provisions of
the medical staff bylaws did not apply.  In reaching this conclusion, the court
specifically rejected the reasoning of the Tennessee Supreme Court in Lewisburg
Community Hospital v. Alfredson. [n131]

   OTHER TYPES OF ECONOMIC ISSUES GIVING RISE TO LEGAL CHALLENGES

   Most of the litigation challenging economic decisions by hospitals has arisen
in the context of hospitals deciding to enter into exclusive contracts or change
exclusive contract providers because of a desire to increase efficiency in the
department or to reduce costs at the hospital. [n132] The federal and state
courts, however, have also addressed other types o economic considerations that
have given rise to challenges over the denial or restriction of privileges.
[n133]

   Affiliation With Competitors or Conflicts of Interest

   The recent Florida trial court decision in Rosenblum v. Tallahassee Regional
Memorial Center has certainly garnered the most publicity surrounding a
hospital's decision to use economic factors in denying privileges. [n134] In
that case, the hospital having denied plaintiff privileges because he was head
of the cardiology department at a competing hospital was granted summary
judgment by the trail court.

   In addition to the Robenblum, there have been numerous other cases in which a
hospital has denied privileges because a physician was affiliated with a
competitor or was competing against the hospital. [n135] For example, in Coffey
v. Healthtrust, [n136] the Tenth Circuit affirmed summary judgment for a 100-bed
acute care hospital in Edmond, Oklahoma, which had terminated the exclusive
contact of its radiology group.  The hospital did so after the radiology group
allegedly began to expand services previously available only at the hospital at
the group's outpatient clinic.  After the group refused to joint venture the
services with the hospital, the hospital opposed the expansion, viewing the
group's actions as disloyal to the hospital and a conflict of interest.

   When the hospital terminated the contract, it entered into a new exclusive
agreement.  The hospital permitted the former exclusive providers to retain
their staff privileges, but limited their exercise of clinical privileges by
preventing them from performing the "official" reading of x-rays with hospital
equipment and personnel.  The hospital also required staff members to
specifically request a consult from the former group on the patients' charts and
to discharge patients at their expense if they wanted radiological procedures
performed by anyone other than the new group.  The Tenth Circuit affirmed
summary judgment against the plaintiff's antitrust challenge to the hospital's
actions.  The court reasoned that the "reshuffling" of competitors had not had a
detrimental effect on competition, and that the plaintiff had failed to
introduce evidence defining a relevant geographic market impacted by the
hospital's actions.

   Similarly, in University Emergency Physicians v. Richmond Co. Hospital
Authority, [n137] the court denied a plaintiff's request for a preliminary
injunction to prevent the hospital from terminating the emergency room physician
group's contract.  The group intended to establish independent clinics in the
community, which might compete with the emergency room at the hospital.  The
hospital had relied on a policy stating that private practice was incompatible
with serving in the emergency medicine department of the hospital, and granted
emergency room privileges only to physicians not engaged in private practice.
The hospital emphasized the potential for conflicts of interest created by the
emergency physician group's simultaneous operation of the hospital emergency
room and private emergency clinics. [n138]

   Miller v. Indiana Hospital [n139] represents another example of an alleged
economic motivation for terminating privileges.  There, the plaintiff urologist
filed an antitrust suit alleging he had been terminated because he had built a
medical-office building two miles from the hospital, and then erected another
building intending to establish a comprehensive family-oriented medical center.
He claimed the hospital viewed his expansion plans as a threat to the hospital,
and thereafter engaged in actions to prevent him from hiring physicians to staff
his medical center, ultimately dismissing him from the medical staff.

   On three separate occasions, the district court granted summary judgment for
the defendants, which was ultimately affirmed after two reversals by the Third
Circuit. [n140] In the first opinion by the Third Circuit, the court reversed
summary judgment for the defendants, noting the plaintiff had produced evidence
showing the termination was motivated by the anticompetitive purpose of
destroying the plaintiff's competition or prospective competition. [n141] The
court relied on an affidavit from a former hospital administrator, which stated
that even before the death of one of the plaintiff's patients, the hospital had
expressed concern about the plaintiff's competition.  The court also relied on
the plaintiff's affidavit setting forth examples of how the hospital had
interfered with his recruitment of medical staff members for has proposed
medical center, of the failure of the hospital to terminate privileges of other
physicians whose actions were allegedly more egregious than the plaintiff's, and
of various improprieties in the peer review process reflecting conflicts of
interests. [n142]

   Over-utilization of Resources

   A physician's over-utilization of resources can also play a role in
determining staff privilege decisions.  The California Joint Statement, which
set forth the position that privileges should not be tied to patient payer mix
or diagnosis, recognized that physicians' over-utilization or under-utilization
of resources could support appropriate intervention. [n143] Also, some hospitals
reportedly use physicians' DRG profile information in the reappointment process
to determine whether a physician is properly using the hospital. [n144]

   There has not been much litigation on this issue in the context of hospital
staff privileges.  In Knapp v. Palos Community Hospital, [n145] the hospital
claimed that for certain diagnoses, the plaintiff's over-utilization of the
hospital resulted in hospitalizations that were 50 percent longer and costs that
were 31 percent greater than those of other staff members.  In recommending
terminating the physician's privileges, the medical staff executive committee
based its decision on over-utilization of the hospital, over-utilization of
tests, as well as inappropriate use of medication, lung scans, and inadequate
management.  After providing the physician with a hearing, the hospital board
upheld the decision.  The plaintiff filed suit, and the trail court initially
enjoined the hospital from excluding the physician.  the Illinois Court of
Appeals reversed, holding because the hospital had followed its bylaws, its
actions were not subject to judicial review.  The court did not discuss the
propriety of the justification for termination.

   In Rao v. St. Elizabeth's Hospital, [n146] the hospital terminated a
physician's privileges for ordering excessive tests, without the medical
justification for ordering such tests, as well as inappropriate interpretations
of echo-cardiograms.  The physician was suspended summarily and, after a
hearing, was permanently suspended.  The trail court upheld the hospital's
decision, and subsequently denied the plaintiff's request for a permanent
injuction.  On appeal, the court affirmed the district court's decision with
respect to preliminary injunction, but noted that the plaintiff should have had
an opportunity for a hearing on the merits concerning a permanent injunction,
although the court expressed skepticism as to the type of evidence a physician
might introduce at such a hearing.

   Outside the context of hospital staff privilege cases, the issue of
over-utilization has also risen in decisions by IPAs and health plans to exclude
providers. [n147] Some courts have been willing to accept the economic
justifications for excluding providers, while other courts have been more
dubious. [n148] For example, in Hassan v. Independent Practice Associates, P.C.,
[n149] the court upheld a decision by the defendant IPA to exclude certain
allergists from the IPA's group health coverage plan.  The plaintiffs alleged
price-fixing and a group boycott, and the defendants claimed that they had
excluded the plaintiff allergists as a result of prior experience with their
participation in the IPA.  The prior experience had indicated a high number of
unjustified tests.  In analyzing the plaintiff's claim, the court determined
that there was no reason to apply a per se group boycott theory.  One of the
reasons for refusing to apply the per se theory, in addition to the absence of
any market power by the defendant, was the fact that the purpose behind the
exclusionary conduct was justifiable.  The court stated:

   The court agrees with defendants that the acts of expulsion and the refusal
to readmit plaintiffs are justified by enhancing efficiency and making the
market more competitive.  First, despite plaintiffs' counsel's contentions at
the hearing, the record shows that plaintiffs do not dispute the fact that IPA
adopted its allergy testing policy to prevent excessive use of costly tests and
that plaintiffs disagree with this policy.  It is also undisputed that cost
containment objectives are procompetitive. [n150]

   Malpractice Insurance Coverage

   To the extent physicians have challenged hospitals' requirements that staff
members have minimum amounts of malpractice coverage, the courts have generally
upheld the right of hospitals to do so. [n151] For example, in Kelly v. St.
Vincent Hospital, [n152] the New Mexico Court of Appeals upheld the right to the
hospital to amend its bylaws to require malpractice insurance as a condition to
obtaining privileges.  The court held that the hospital had a legitimate
business purpose in terminating a physician's privileges and refusing to exempt
the plaintiff from the new requirement.  Similarly, in Jones v. Yonkers General
Hospital, [n153] the court upheld the right of the hospital to terminate a
physician's privileges for, inter alia, failure to maintain malpractice
insurance.  The court held that a hospital's requirement of malpractice
insurance was consistent with a legitimate objective of the institution, and
that the physician's privileges could be terminated for failure to comply with
this objective.

   TURF BATTLES

   Another example of the increasing economic pressure on health care providers
is the outbreak of disputes among providers for the exclusive right to perform
certain procedures within hospitals. [n154] These battles often occur among
different physician specialists: radiologists and neurologists battle over the
ability to read computerized axial tomography (CT) scans or perform magnetic
resonance imaging (MRI) procedures: nonphysicians and physicians, such as
podiatrists and orthopedic surgeons, battles over the scope of the practice
permitted for podiatrists.  Additionally, disputes have arisen between plastic
surgeons and ear, nose, and throat specialists psychiatrists and psychologists,
gastroenterologists and internists, obstetricians and nurse mid-wives, and
numerous other specialties and sub-specialties over the ability of providers to
be credentialed to perform services within the hospital.

   Most of these disputes are resolved without litigation.  Nevertheless, the
resolution often requires expenditures of time and energy by members of the
medical executive committee, department chairs, hospital administrators and
board members.  When problems cannot be resolved peacefully, the courts become
the final decision makers.  They have generally been deferential to hospitals in
this area so long as the hospital board makes the ultimate decision as to which
provider is credentialed to perform services.  The courts have recognized that
economic motivations often form the basis for the decision. [n155]

   A recent case illustrating the point is the Eleventh Circuit's decision in
Todorov v. DCH Health care Authority. [n156] The Eleventh Circuit affirmed
summary judgment in favor of the defendantsin which a neurologist had requested
certain radiology privileges to perform CT scans, and the hospital refused to
grant the privileges.  Although there apparently was no exclusive contract
between the hospital and the radiologists, nevertheless, there was only one
radiology group at the hospital, and its members objected to the plaintiff's
obtaining privileges to read CT scans at the hospital.  The hospital board had
based its denial primarily on the need to preserve the efficient operation of
the radiology department and out of fear that approving the plaintiff's
application would invite a flood of other nonradiologist applications.  The
court noted that the board was concerned that, if it granted the plaintiff's
application, the radiology department would become unmanageable -- experiencing
scheduling delays, increased operation and upkeep costs, and an overall decrease
in the quality of service.  This, in turn, would impair the department's ability
to turn a profit.  DCH claimed, in effect, that its board decided that the
competitive benefits the hospital's radiology department would gain from greater
efficiency by denying the neurologist's privileges outweighed the additional
revenue the department might generate from a greater volume of business by
granting him privileges. [n157]

   The court thus recognized as legitimate the economic concerns of the hospital
for refusing to grant privileges.  Also, the court held that there could be no
illegal conspiracy in the denial of privileges because the board had
"unilaterally" denied the plaintiff's application for privileges. [n158]

   Todorov illustrates that, so long as a hospital board makes the final
decision and does not merely acquiesce to the demands of a certain group of
physicians, any turf battles over providing existing or new services at the
hospital that result in litigation should be resolved in favor of the hospital.
However, if decisions are made and implemented at the medical staff level
without the involvement of the hospital board, the physicians and the hospital
run a greater risk of the decision being viewed simply as a collective group
boycott, thereby increasing the potential of liability for the hospital and the
medical staff.

   MEDICAL STAFF DEVELOPMENT PLANS

   One of the potential causes for friction between a hospital and its medical
staff is the decision by the hospital board to develop a "medical staff
development plan." Indeed, many times the issue of economic credentialing and
recruitment of new physicians into a community is a direct result of the medical
staff development plan adopted by a hospital.  In large part, the friction that
develops is a result of the plan being imposed on physicians.

   Increasing pressure from managed care plans often require hospitals to reach
out and attract new specialists who can better position the hospital to be
competitive in bidding on managed care contracts.  This type of incentive often
runs counter to the interests of those physicians already on the staff who feel
economically threatened by the arrival of new physicians in their own specialty.

   One of the benefits of preparing a medical staff development plan is that it
may force the hospital to do the type of research necessary to document the
specific community needs for certain physicians.  This type of documentation may
assist the hospital in justifying incentives it offers to recruit new physicians
into the community, positioning the hospital to respond to any concerns raised
by the Internal Revenue Service (IRS) or Office of Inspector General (OIG) for
possible fraud and abuse or private inurement violations.

   Physician recruiters and medical staff consultants have championed the the
virtue of involving the medical staff in the early stages of medical staff
development planning and have emphasized that such involvement: 1) improves the
hospital's ability to predict expected attrition by specialty; 2) furnishes
additional data regarding local competing hospitals; 3) links facility plans,
including medical office building construction, with physician personnel
requirements; and 4) provides a vehicle for involvement of the medical staff in
the hospital's long-range planning process, thus promoting an integrated common
vision between the hospital and medical staff. [n159]

   Even though there are great benefits to be derived from obtaining the
physicians' input into medical staff development plan, the hospital walks a fine
line between involving physicians and letting them control the decisions about
medical staff recruitment.  To the extent a development plan indicates no need
for additional physicians on a staff, the development plan could be Exhibit "A"
in any suit filed by a physician denied access because of the hospital's
reliance on a plan that was largely a result of the medical staff's decision.
Instead, the board needs always to maintain the final say in adopting the plan,
and should do so with the balanced view of what is best for the community and
best for the economic future of the hospital.

   THE IMPACT OF FEDERAL EMPLOYMENT STATUTES ON STAFF PRIVILEGE DECISIONS

   In recent years, hospital administrators have become accustomed to the
increasing number of regulations imposed upon them which govern their
responsibilities and duties to employees.  The recent enactment of the Americans
with Disabilities Act (ADA), [n160] along with Title VII of the Civil Rights Act
of 1964 (Title VII), [n161] the Age Discrimination in Employment Act (ADEA),
[n162] and Section 1981 of the 1866 Civil Rights Act (Section 1981) [n163] have
given rise to potential claims by hospital employees for discrimination in
hiring or employment on the basis of race, religion, sex, national origin and
age.  While cases brought by employees under these statutes have often reached
different results, hospitals have seldom had to confront the issue whether the
statutes apply to decisions on granting staff privilege.  That luxury may soon
be coming to an end.

   At first blush, none of these statues appears applicable to staff privilege
decisions except in situations where the hospital directly employs the
physician.  However, the relationship of a hospital to a physician as an
employer/employee is often murky.  Other than physicians directly employed by
the hospital, hospital-based physicians arguably have the greatest potential to
be considered hospital employees.  For example, the IRS uses approximately
twenty common law factors concerning the degree of control the employer
maintains over the employee to determine whether an employee/employer
relationship exists, and no single factor is dispositive. [n164] Given the
hospital's control over their workplace, the hospital's providing facilities and
personnel to support their activities, and their lack of other sources of
revenue, hospital-based physicians likely would satisfy several of the IRS
criteria, despite language to the contrary in contracts with the hospital and
the IRS' recognition that physicians generally will not be viewed as employees.

   More chilling than the amorphous IRS guidelines is the fact that in recent
years some courts have applied the requirements of Title VII to a hospital's
denial or restriction of privileges concerning even nonhospital-based
physicians. [n165] For example, in Pardazi v. Cullman Medical Center, [n166] the
Eleventh Circuit reversed a summary judgment on behalf of the hospital in a
Title VII action.  The lower court held that because the physician was not an
employer of the hospital, he was not entitled to relief under Title VII. [n167]
The Eleventh Circuit disagreed and remanded the physician's claims that he had
been denied staff privileges based on his national origin. [n168]

   The plaintiff alleged not that he was an employee of the hospital but that
the hospital's action had interfered with his employment opportunities with
another professional corporation, which had required he obtain medical staff
privileges before being employed.  The court held that Title VII protection
extended to a claim that a defendant had interfered with an individual's
employment relationship with a third party. [n169] The court further held that
such a claim fit squarely within the language of Title VII, making it unlawful
"'to discriminate against any individual with respect to his compensation,
terms, conditions, or privileges of employment,'" and rejected the defendant's
"unduly restrictive interpretation" of Title VII. [n170]

   Similarly, in Gomez v. Alexian Brothers Hospital of San Jose, [n171] a
physician alleged that the hospital failed to award him an emergency room
contract because of his national origin, depriving him of employment as director
of the emergency room.  The Ninth Circuit held he had standing to assert a Title
VII claim.  Even though the plaintiff had submitted the contract proposal on
behalf of his professional corporation, the court held that merely because he
continued to be an employee of his professional corporation did not mean that
the hospital had not interfered with his employment relationship with his
professional corporation.

   Similarly, in Doe on Behalf of Doe v. St. Joseph's Hospital, [n172] the
Seventh Circuit reversed summary judgment against a physician who alleged that
her privileges were terminated as a result of discrimination based on race and
national origin.  The court specifically upheld her Title VII claim based on the
allegation that the termination had interfered with employment opportunities.
In relying on the seminal decision of Sibley Memorial Hospital v. Wilson, [n173]
the court concluded "Congress presumably did not intend to allow the hospital to
exploit its power to grant and deny staff privileges in order to
discriminatorily interfere with Doe's employment opportunities with her
patients." [n174] Other courts have upheld claims by physicians under Title VII
following similar reasoning. [n175]

   Not all lower courts, however, have been willing to allow a physician who is
not directly employed by the hospital to assert claims under Title VII. [n176]
Indeed, several cases have rejected such claims. [n177] For example, in Beverley
v. Douglas, [n178] the Southern District of New York reasoned that whether an
individual was an employee for purposes of Title VII required an analysis of the
"economic realities" of the situation, with the extent of the employer's right
to control the "means and manner" of the worker's performance as the most
important factor. [n179] The court followed the analysis of the D.C. Circuit
Court of Appeals decision in Sirides v. Reinhard, [n180] which focused on the
following factors in deciding whether an individual was an employee for purposes
of Title VII: 1) the kind of occupation, with reference to whether the work
usually is done under the direction of the supervisor, or is done by a
specialist without supervision; 2) the skill required in the particular
occupation; 3) whether the "employer" or the individual in question furnishes
the equipment used and the place of work; 4) the length of time during which the
individual has worked; 5) the method of payment, whether by time or by the job;
6) the manner in which the work relationship is terminated, for example, by one
or both parties, with or without notice and explanation; 7) whether annual leave
is afforded; 8) whether the work is an integral part of the business of the
"employer"; 9) whether the worker accumulates retirement benefits; 10) whether
the "employer" pays Social Security taxes; and 11) the intention of the parties.
[n181]

   Based on the above factors, the court in Beverly held that a staff physician
did not qualify as an employee for purposes of Title VII.  Therefore, the
physician had no claim against the hospital for denial of privileges.

   Similarly, in Diggs v. Harris Hospital-Methodist, [n182] the Fifth Circuit
held that the employer/employee relationship did not exist between a physician
and a hospital thus precluding a Title VII claim.  The court also held that the
physician did not have a claim under Title VII on the ground that the hospital's
action interfered with her employment opportunities with her patients because
she did not have an employee/employer relationship with those patients.  The
court emphasized that in applying the economic reality/common law control test
as the appropriate standard for Title VII, the plaintiff needed hospital staff
privileges to pursue her medical practice, but there was no evidence that
privileges at the defendant hospital were necessary to her practice, or that
denial of privileges hampered her ability to obtain staff privileges at any
other hospital in the area.

   The above cases demonstrate the potential for disagreement over the
application of federal statutes aimed at protecting employees and the statutes'
applicability to physicians in staff privilege matters.  However, given the
tendency for some courts to apply a broad definition of "employer" under Title
VII, hospitals are likely to see more claims by physicians under statutes such
as Title VII, as well as the ADA and ADEA, when privileges are terminated or
restricted.

   Claims Under the ADEA

   The Age Discrimination in Employment Act (ADEA) prohibits discrimination in
employment based on age. [n183] Because the plaintiff bears the ultimate burden
of proving that age was the determinative factor in discharge, a plaintiff sets
forth a prima facia case by demonstrating: 1) plaintiff was over forty; 2)
plaintiff's work performance was satisfactory; 3) plaintiff's employer took
adverse action; and 4) the employer sought a replacement establishing a
continued need for the same services and skills. [n184] Alternatively, a
plaintiff can satisfy the burden of a prima facia case by presenting credible,
direct evidence of discriminatory intent. [n185] The burden shifts, and the
defendant must introduce evidence to establish a legitimate, nondiscriminatory
reason for the adverse employment decision. [n186] The burden shifts back, and
the plaintiff must show that the employer's proffered reason is actually a
pretext for the age discrimination alleged.

   There have been numerous decisions dealing with the applicability of the ADEA
in the hospital context, primarily involving nurses and other employees of the
hospital who have claimed discrimination based on their age. [n187] While there
have been very few cases involving a similar claim by a physician, at least one
court recognized the applicability of the ADEA to a physician's claim. [n188] In
Vakharia v. Swedish Covenant Hospital, [n189] the plaintiff was a forty-five-old
woman anesthesiologist, born in Bombay, India.  She filed suit under Title VII,
the ADEA, and section 1981, claiming that she was assigned fewer and less
desirable cases, was classified as a "junior member" of the anesthesiology
department, was denied positions for which she was qualified, and subsequently
suspended from the hospital's medical staff.

   The court, at least for purposes of ruling on the defendant's motion to
dismiss, found that because the physician in question was an anesthesiologist
without any outside practice or outside patients whom she would admit to the
hospital, there was the possibility that the plaintiff and the hospital shared
an employment relationship. [n190] Alternatively, the court found that the
plaintiff had adequately alleged the existence of an employment relationship
between herself and her patients or prospective patients.  Interestingly enough,
in denying the hospital's motion to dismiss, the court did not discuss the
plaintiff's ADEA claims.  Instead, the court appeared to lump the ADEA claim
together with the Title VII and Section 1981 claims.  Nevertheless, the Vakharia
decision is an example of one case where a physician challenged termination of
staff privileges under the ADEA and survived a motion to dismiss.

   The ADEA also may create problems for hospitals if medical staff bylaws
include an age limit on staff membership.  For example, if medical staff bylaws
permitted privileges only to those under the age of sixty-five, and if a
physician were able to establish the "employment" nexus, that physician could
well have a claim under ADEA if he or she were denied privileges because of
exceeding the age limitation. [n191] Alternatively, if medical staff bylaws
required only those medical staff members beyond the age of sixty-five to submit
to physical or mental examinations, demonstrating their continued fitness to
practice at the hospital, such a policy might also expose the hospital to legal
liability under the ADEA. [n192]

   However, if age references were eliminated from bylaws, there would be less
exposure under the ADEA.  The hospital could address its concerns over staff
members being unable to function effectively because of illnesses or problems
caused by age through the normal peer review process.  Additionally, if the
hospital requires all medical staff members to obtain minimum amounts of
malpractice insurance the hospital might be able to accomplish the same goal.

   Potential Liability Under the ADA

   The Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) prohibits employers from
discriminating against any "qualified individual with a disability because of
the disability of such individual in regard to job application procedures, the
hiring, advancement, or discharge of employees, employee compensation, job
training, and other terms, conditions, and privileges of employment." [n193]
While it is much too new to have established precedent to flesh out fully its
impact on hospitals, the Act clearly will apply to employees of hospitals.  The
more daunting question is whether the Act will also apply to physicians.

   Already, at least one physician has filed suit under the Act. [n194] In
November, 1992, an orthopedic surgeon filed suit in the Eastern District of
Pennsylvania alleging that Mercy Catholic Medical Center of Southeastern
Pennsylvania had violated the ADA when it restricted his surgical privileges
after learning he was infected with HIV. [n195] As part of his complaint, the
physician claimed that he was qualified to perform his surgical duties and did
not pose a signficant risk to patients.  He further alleges that the defendants
have failed to offer a "reasonable accommodation to his disability" and that he
has been excluded from participating in federally-funded programs solely on the
basis of his handicap and been denied privileges at a place of public
accommodation because of his disability in violation of the ADA. [n196]

   The difficulty of complying with the terms of the ADA, particularly for
HIV-positive individuals, is also demonstrated by the recent case where a
pharmacist sued a medical center that allegedly reneged on the offer to hire him
because he was HIV-positive. [n197] Even though that case was brought under the
Rehabilitation Act of 1973, [n198] many of its provisions are similar to the
ADA's provisions. [n199] The case was recently settled with the hospital
offering the pharmacist an unrestricted position, back pay and attorneys' fees
of $ 300,000. [n200]

   The issue of whether the ADA applies to medical staff members is particularly
pertinent where the medical staff bylaws may require physical examinations as
part of the appointment process.  Indeed, health status of staff members is
recognized by the JCAHO as a key factor on which to base staff appointments.  At
least one commentator has taken the position that, given the liberal
interpretation by some courts of the employer/employee relationship under Title
VII, a conservative approach for a hospital would be to comply with the terms of
the ADA on the presumption that the Act does apply to hospital staff
relationships. [n201]

   Along these lines, the EEOC has issued interpretative guidelines to the
regulations of the ADA that state the term "employee" under the Act will have
the same meaning as under Title VII. [n202] Therefore, a conservative approach
to complying with the Act might not be unreasonable.

   The nuances of the ADA are far beyond the scope of this paper.  Nevertheless,
it is worth noting that in prohibiting discrimination against disabled
individuals, the ADA substantially expands the definition of disabled
individuals to include those with physical or mental handicaps, as well as those
with a history of a disability, such as a prior drug addiction and alcoholism.
Taking any adverse action because of current or former alcoholism, or against
persons with a history of conditions that affect a major life activity will
violate the ADA.  Major life activities are broadly defined to include walking,
seeing, hearing and working.

   Under the ADA, prospective employers are prohibited from questioning
candidates about their medical history or about the severity of any medical
conditions or any diseases before the employer makes a job offer. [n203] The
Act, however, does not prohibit an employer from requiring a medical exam after
an offer is made but before employment commences. [n204] The offer can be
conditioned on the medical result, so long as the decision to withdraw the offer
is job-related and consistent with business necessity. [n205] Although the ADA
does permit examinations required by medical standards or federal, state, or
local law, those requirements must be consistent with the ADA. [n206]

   An employer can withdraw an offer based on the results of a medical
examination, so long as the reasons for withdrawal meet the ADA's
nondiscrimination standards regarding job relatedness and business necessity.
[n207] However, the ADA does not prevent an employer from denying appointment or
reappointment based on an employee's testing positive for the use of illegal
drugs.  Because drug tests are not considered a medical exam under the ADA drug
tests can be given at any time. [n208]

   The disclosure of medical information regarding an individual also creates a
potential liability under the ADA, which requires that information learned
through the medical examination be kept confidential. [n209] Therefore, the
waiver or release by a physician as part of the staff application process may
not be sufficient to permit a hospital to release confidential medical
information concerning that physician.

   If physicians seeking reappointment to a medical staff are viewed as existing
employees rather than job applicants, the ADA may limit medical examinations to
those that are job related and consistent with business necessity.  Thus,
requiring a general physical as part of the reappointment process might be
contrary to the ADA.  As one commentator has observed:

   Evidence of a safety problem or deficient job performance may trigger the
examination.  Still, the examination must be limited in scope to determining
whether the individual can perform the essential functions of the job.
Requiring a complete physical is impermissible, as is requiring a physician to
submit to an HIV test, if HIV status is not related to the essential functions
of the job or the physician's specific impairment.  Denying reappointment
because of a condition revealed during the physical exam must be job related and
justified by business necessity, under the same analysis applied to first time
applicants.  An individual who poses a "direct threat" to health or safety
presents a job-related reason for not hiring that is consistent with business
necessity. [n210]

   The ADA goes on to require that if an individual is disabled, then the
employer must make a reasonable accommodation to enable the employee to overcome
that disability affecting his ability to perform the essential functions of the
job.  However, the employer is not required to provide accommodations that would
pose an undue hardship. [n211] If it would pose an undue hardship, denial of the
accommodation and removal of the employee would not violate the ADA.

   The tension caused by the potential applicability of the ADA to hospitals is
made even more stark by the position of the American Health Lawyers Association
(AHA), which has urged its members to increase testing of employees and
physicians for drug and alcohol use. [n212] Although the AHA noted that legal
advice was particularly important because of the impact of the ADA, such testing
is likely to increase among hospitals, and physicians can be expected to rely on
the ADA if their privileges are restricted as a result of such testing.

   CONCLUSION

   The winds of change are certainly blowing through the health care industry.
In the final analysis, it will be very difficult to reconcile the goals and
objectives of the hospital and medical staff members all of the time.  Indeed,
certain physicians will always feel threatened or adversely affected by
decisions that the hospital may be compelled to make in order to serve its
patients, provide care to the community, and act in the best interests of the
majority of the physicians on the staff.  Nevertheless, so long as the hospital
administration and board maintain a good open dialogue with members of the
medical staff, most problems can be averted short of litigation.

   The issue of economic credentialing, regardless of how it is defined, will
certainly be increasingly important as financial pressures increase on hospitals
and other health care providers, including physicians.  In order to enhance the
ability to defend against such claims, especially claims arising from decisions
to close a department or medical staff, a hospital board should consider taking
the following precautions:

   1.  Ensure that the decision is made by the board, and not by potential
competitors of the affected physicians.

   2.  The board's decision to "close" a medical staff or hospital department
should be made only after providing all affected parties a full opportunity to
discuss the issues.  Even though not required under the medical staff bylaws,
providing an opportunity for such a hearing or offering the contract to a
provider who subsequently rejects it, will likely undercut the argument that the
decision was arbitrary.

   3.  The board's decision to close a staff or enter into an exclusive
contractual arrangement should be premised on an outside report by a reputable
health care consultant or expert recommending such action.  A prior objective
recommendation by a neutral third-party will likely buttress the hospital's
position that the decision was not vindictive in nature and was within the
appropriate authority and jurisdiction of the board.

   If the hospital's decision is based primarily on the goal of advancing
legitimate economic interests of the hospital, and is not merely retaliatory
against an individual provider or arbitrary in nature, then the decision will
likely be upheld by the courts.  Absent protective state legislation or the
adoption of medical staff bylaws that specifically prohibit credentialing or
privileging decisions based on economic factors, hospitals should not face
serious liability from economic credentialing decisions.

   From the perspective of the hospital, whether it is recruiting new physicians
or imposing a drug testing policy, so long as the hospital acts in a manner
which is based primarily on better serving the patients in the community and the
majority of its medical staff, the hospital will be in a good position to defend
itself in any litigation brought by adversely affected physicians.  Simply
stated, the hospital should not be afraid of taking appropriate actions when
confronting new economic pressures or determining which physicians can best
assist in achieving the hospital's institutional goals.



REFERENCE: [n2.] A PPO is an organization of physicians who, or hospitals which,
contract with employers and insurers to provide a full range of health care
services. Services are offered to members on a fee-for-service basis, at a
discount. If a member opts to see a physician not affiliated with the PPO, he
can be required to make a coinsurance payment. Jeffrey B. Schwartz, The
Preferred Provider Organization as an Alternative Delivery System, 6 J. LEGAL
MED. 150 (1985). In the case of an HMO, members pay a single subscription fee in
return for a full range of health care services including walk-in services and
hospitalization. The HMO may own the facilities that provide the services or it
may contract with such facilities to provide services to the subscriber. WILLIAM
J. CURREN, ET AL., HEALTH CARE LAW, FORENSIC SCIENCE & PUBLIC POLICY 255
(Richard A. Epstein et al. eds., 4th ed. 1990).
[n1.] Thomas L. Friedman, Clinton Rules Out Delay in Unveiling Health Care Plan,
N.Y. TIMES, Apr. 28, 1993, at A1.

   [n3.] "DRGs" refers to the classification of Medicare patients into 470
different homogeneous groups based on factors of principal diagnosis, age, sex,
procedures performed, discharge status, and any secondary diagnosis. A hospital
is reimbursed according to the DRG-specific rate. Diana Vance Bryan, Note:
Medicare's Prospective Payment System: Can Quality Care Service? 69 IOWA L. REV.
1420-1421 (1984). "RBRVS" sets the amount reimbursed for a single procedure,
giving the general practitioner an increase while decreasing payments to
specialists. John Farkey, Note: The Medicare Antifraud Statute and Safe Harbor
Regulations: Suggestions for Change, 81 GEO. L.J. 182 (1992).

   [n4.] Terese Hudson, Factoring in the Financials: Courts Give Nod to Economic
Credentialing, HOSPITALS, Apr. 5, 1993, at 36.

   [n5.] 42 U.S.C. § 12101 (1993).

   [n6.] 29 U.S.C. § 621 (Supp. 1993).

   [n7.] See Oksanen v. Page Mem. Hosp., 946 F.2d 696 (4th Cir. 1990).

   [n8.] Economic credentialing refers to the use of economic practice patterns
of a physician as a factor in determining whether to grant hospital staff
privileges to the physician. See Mary T. Koska, Hospital CEOs Divided on Use of
Economic Credentialing, HOSPITALS, Mar. 20, 1991, at 42.

   [n9.] AMA Policy Compendium (1990 Ed.) § 47.022. See also Katherine Benesch,
Credentialing Criteria Puts Hospitals at Risk, NEW JERSEY L.J., Apr. 5, 1993, at
10; Jay Greene, Economic Credentialing, MOD. HEALTHCARE, Nov. 16, 1992, at 10.

   [n10.] See Medical Staff, HOSPITALS, Nov. 5, 1992, at 20.

   [n11.] Id.

   [n12.] See Joint Statement on Economic Credentialing and Exclusive
Contracting, CALIFORNIA MEDICAL ASSOCIATION & CALIFORNIA ASSOCIATION OF
HOSPITALS AND HEALTH SYSTEMS (Jan. 1992) (hereinafter referred to as CALIFORNIA
JOINT STATEMENT).

   [n13.] Proposed Changes in Bylaws Upset Hospital's Medical Staff, MODERN
HEALTHCARE, Aug. 10, 1992, at 18; Bellam v. Clayton County Hosp. Auth., 758 F.
Supp. 1488 (N.D. Ga. 1990) (anesthesiologists sued hospital challenging
exclusive contract); Drs. Steuer & Latham, P.A. v. National Medical Enters.,
Inc., 672 F. Supp. 1489 (D.S.C. 1987) (pathology providers sued hospital for
granting exclusive contract to another), aff'd, 846 F.2d 70 (4th Cir. 1988);
Mays v. Hosp. Auth., 596 F. Supp. 120 (N.D. Ga. 1984) (radiologist sued hospital
for granting corporation exclusive privileges for providing primary radiological
services).

   [n14.] See, e.g., Blue Cross of Washington & Alaska v. Kitsap Physicians
Service, 1982-1 Trade Cas. (CCH) P64,589 (W.D. Wash. 1981).

   [n15.] John D. Blum, Economic Credentialing: A New Twist in Hospital
Appraisal Processes, 12 J. LEGAL MED. 428-29 (1991) (footnotes omitted)
(hereinafter Blum, Economic Credentialing).

   [n16.] Mary T. Koska, Review Exclusive Contracts in Light of Challenges,
HOSPITALS, Apr. 20, 1992, at 38.

   [n17.] Medical Staff, HOSPITALS, Nov. 5, 1992, at 20.

   [n18.] Compare Howard L. Lang, M.D., Curb Economic Credentialing, MODERN
HEALTHCARE, Apr. 29, 1991, at 28 with Frederic L. Merchant, Jr., Credentialing
Is a Fact of Life, MODERN HEALTHCARE, June 17, 1991, at 36.

   [n19.] AMA Policy Compendium (1990 Ed.), § 47.022.

   [n20.] Id.

   [n21.] See Medical Staff, HOSPITALS, Nov. 5, 1992, at 20.

   [n22.] See id.

   [n23.] Blum, Economic Credentialing, 12 J. LEGAL MED. at 464.

   [n24.] See Mateo Woodburn v. Fresno Community Hosp., 270 Cal. Rptr. 894 (Cal.
Ct. App. 1990) (anesthesiologist sued hospital for, inter alia, closing
department); Faucher v. Rodziewicz, 891 F.2d 864 (11th Cir. 1990)
(anesthesiologist claimed staff privileges of clinical director interfered with
anesthesiologist's business and employee relations); Shahawy v. Harrison, 778
F.2d 636 (11th Cir. 1985) (physician sued because of hospital's denial of
privilege of conducting cardiac catheterizations in hospital lab); Engelstad v.
Virginia Mun. Hosp., 718 F.2d 262 (8th Cir. 1983) (pathologist sued hospital for
terminating him as director of pathology department alleging resulting
reductions in hospital staff privileges).

   [n25.] See Jones v. Yonkers Gen. Hosp., Inc., 143 A.D.2d 885, (N.Y. App. Div.
1988) (upholding termination based on, inter alia, failure to obtain malpractice
insurance); Kelly v. St. Vincent Hosp., 692 P.2d 1350, 1353-4 (N.M. App. 1984)
(upholding requirement of malpractice insurance).

   [n26.] For example, one hospital in Maryland uses a physician's DRG profile
information in the reappointment process in the following way: The hospital will
first examine the physician's patients' lengths of stay by DRG, measured against
state-wide averages, and the physician's charges by DRG, measured against
hospital averages. If the physician has patient stays and charges that exceed
105% of those averages, then the hospital will examine the physician's practice
more thoroughly. The hospital will look at data from utilization review programs
for denials of admissions, days and services; malpractice cases in which the
physician was a co-defendant with the hospital in actions resulting in
settlements of over $ 30,000; timeliness of medical record completion; and bad
debts exceeding 15% of the total hospital charges generated by the physician.
See Mary T. Koska, Hospital CEOs Divided on Use of Economic Credentialing,
HOSPITALS, Mar. 20, 1991, at 42, 44.

   [n27.] See supra note 12.

   [n28.] For a more detailed analysis of the specific types of economic
criteria which the CMA finds acceptable or not acceptable, see John D. Blum,
Hospital-Medical Staff Relations in the Face of Shifting Business Strategies: A
Legal Analysis, 14 UNIV. OF PUGET SOUND L. REV. 584-585 n.106 and 107.

   [n29.] No. 91-589 (Fla. Cir. Ct., June 22, 1992) (hereinafter Rosenblum).

   [n30.] Robert Pear, U.S. Says Hospitals Demand Physicians Pay For Referrals,
N.Y. TIMES, Sept. 28, 1992, at A1, A9 (citing Rosenblum as the first case in
which a court has upheld a hospital's use of economic credentialing in deciding
to deny privileges).

   [n31.] Rosenblum, No. 91-589, slip. op. at 3.

   [n32.] Id., slip. op at 4. Although the trial court's decision was appealed,
the parties settled the litigation before any decision was rendered by the
Florida Court of Appeals.

   [n33.] Coffey v. Healthtrust, 955 F.2d 1388 (10th Cir. 1992).

   [n34.] Ingraffia v. NME Hosps., 943 F.2d 561 (5th Cir. 1991) (physician
challenging exclusive contract for radiological services alleging restriction of
privileges); Beard v. Parkview Hosp., 912 F.2d 138 (6th Cir. 1990) (challenging
exclusive contract as antitrust violation).

   [n35.] The challenges usually allege violations of sections 1 and 2 of the
Sherman Act, 15 U.S.C. §§ 1 & 2 (1993). See Shahawy v. Harrison, 778 F.2d 636
(11th Cir. 1985) (physician sued hospital alleging denial of privileges violated
15 U.S.C. § 1, Civil Rights, and federal and state contract laws); Beard v.
Parkview Hosp., 912 F.2d 138 (6th Cir. 1990) (radiologist brought antitrust
action under Sherman Act, section 2, challenging exclusive contract granted by
hospital).

   [n36.] See Faucher v. Rodziewicz, 891 F.2d 864 (11th Cir. 1990)
(anesthesiologist filed section 1983 action in suit against hospital's clinical
director and executive director as county officials); Engelstad v. Virginia Mun.
Hosp., 718 F.2d 262 (8th Cir. 1983) (Civil Rights claim that hospital violated
physician's constitutional rights by terminating his directorship without
procedural due process protection).

   [n37.] See St. Mary's Hosp. of Athens v. Radiology Professional Corp., 421
S.E.2d 731 (Ga. Ct. App. 1992) (radiologist claimed termination of privileges
was tortious interference with existing and prospective contractual relations,
intentional infliction of emotional distress, deprivation of due process, and
abusive litigation); Lewisburg Community Hosp. v. Alfredson, 805 S.W.2d 756
(Tenn. 1991) (radiologist claimed breach of contract for failure to grant
hearing after termination of contract to provide exclusive radiological
services); Mateo-Woodburn v. Fresno Community Hosp., 270 Cal. Rptr. 894 (Cal.
Ct. App. 1990) (anesthesiologists challenged hospital decision to go to closed
system for tortious interference with business relations); Berman v. Valley
Hosp., 510 A.2d 673 (N.J. 1986) (physicians brought antitrust and tort suit
because of exclusionary staff privilege policy); Desai v. St. Barnabus Medical
Ctr., 510 A.2d 662 (N.J. 1986) (physician challenged closed-staff policy of
hospital under state antitrust statute); Lewin v. St. Joseph Hosp., 146 Cal.
Rptr. 892 (Cal. Ct. App. 1978) (hospital closed-staff policy did not constitute
tortious or unlawful interference with physician's right to pursue profession).

   [n38.] 42 U.S.C. § 1395nn (1992) and 42 U.S.C. §§ 1320a-76 (1991). See also
Robert Pear, U.S. Says Hospitals Demand Physicians Pay For Referrals, N.Y.
TIMES, Sept. 28, 1992, at A1.

   [n39.] OIG Management Advisory Report, Financial Arrangements Between
Hospitals and Hospital-Based Physicians, Jan. 31, 1991 (EI1-09-89-0030);
Medicare & Medicaid Guide (CCH) P39,669.

   [n40.] Bellam v. Clayton County Hosp. Auth., 758 F. Supp. 1488 (N.D. Ga.
1990); Drs. Steurer & Latham, P.A. v. National Medical Enters, 672 F. Supp. 1489
(D.S.C. 1987) (challenging exclusive pathology contract), aff'd, 846 F.2d 70
(4th Cir. 1988); Beard v. Parkview Hosp., 912 F.2d 138 (6th Cir. 1990)
(challenging exclusive radiological contract).

   [n41.] See supra note 35.

   [n42.] Oksanen v. Page Memorial Hosp., 945 F.2d 696 (4th Cir. 1991).

   [n43.] Id.

   [n44.] 466 U.S. 2 (1984).

   [n45.] Id. at 26-27.

   [n46.] Id. at 30-31 (footnote omitted). The Federal Trade Commission (FTC)
reached a similar result in analyzing an exclusive radiology contract at a
hospital in the Champaign-Urbana, Illinois area. In Burnham Hosp., 101 F.T.C.
991 (1983), the FTC analyzed the contract under the more sweeping prohibitions
of section 5 of the FTC Act, 15 U.S.C. § 45, which prohibits "unfair methods of
competition." The FTC utilized the same type of factor analysis as the Supreme
Court in Hyde to conclude that where the hospital board unilaterally decided to
enter into the exclusive contract, the contract is of reasonable duration or
terminable by hospital on reasonable notice, and the hospital lacks market power
in the relevant market, the contract is more procompetitive than
anticompetitive.

   [n47.] Coffey v. Healthtrust, 955 F.2d 1388 (10th Cir. 1992).

   [n48.] Mays v. Hosp. Auth., 582 F. Supp. 425 (N.D. Ga. 1984).

   [n49.] 672 F. Supp. 1489 (D.S.C. 1987), aff'd, 846 F.2d 70 (4th Cir. 1988).

   [n50.] Id. at 1517 n.32.

   [n51.] Id. at 1497.

   [n52.] Id. at 1502.

   [n53.] Id. at 1509-15.

   [n54.] Id. at 1516.

   [n55.] Id. at 1516-19.

   [n56.] Id. at 1519-21.

   [n57.] Coffey v. Healthtrust, 955 F.2d at 1388; Gonzalez v. Insignares,
1985-2 Trade Cas. (CCH) P66,701 (N.D. Ga. 1985); Collins v. Associated
Pathologists, 676 F. Supp. 1388 (C.D. Ill. 1987), aff'd, 844 F.2d 473 (7th
Cir.); Friedman v. Delaware Memorial Hosp., 672 F. Supp. 171 (E.D. Pa. 1987),
aff'd, 849 F.2d 600 (3d. Cir. 1988); Mays v. Hosp. Auth., 582 F. Supp. 425 (N.D.
Ga. 1984) and 596 F. Suppl 120 (1984).

   [n58.] Bellam v. Clayton County Hosp. Auth., 758 F. Supp. 1488 (N.D. Ga.
1990); Bellmar v. Cipolla, 975 A.2d 533 (N.J. 1984).

   [n59.] 758 F. Supp. 1488 (N.D. Ga. 1990).

   [n60.] Id. at 1491. The ASA representatives orally recommended closing the
department, but subsequently in their written report noted the ASA policy
against contracts with prevent granting privileges to anesthesiologists.
Nevertheless, they reaffirmed the goal of giving the contract physician
sufficient authority to organize the department into a functioning unit "with or
without a contract."

   [n61.] Id. at 1494.

   [n62.] Id. at 1493.

   [n63.] Id. at 1493-1494.

   [n64.] Id. at 1494.

   [n65.] Faucher v. Rodziewicz, 891 F.2d 864 (11th Cir. 1990).

   [n66.] Mays v. Hosp. Auth., 582 F. Supp. 425 (N.D. Ga. 1984).

   [n67.] Id.

   [n68.] Id. at 427.

   [n69.] Id. at 429.

   [n70.] Id.

   [n71.] Id. at 430.

   [n72.] Id.

   [n73.] 42 U.S.C. § 1983. See Faucher v. Rodziewicz, 891 F.2d 864 (11th cir.
1990) (holding that because plaintiff's medical staff privileges had been
reduced, not terminated, he had no due process claim); Boucvalt v. Board of
Comm'r of Hosp. Service Dist. No. 1, 798 F.2d 722 (5th Cir. 1986) (holding that
deprivation of plaintiff's source of income did not violate due process).

   [n74.] Shahawy v. Harrison, 875 F.2d 1529, 1532 (11th Cir. 1990); Bellam v.
Clayton County Hosp. Auth., 758 F. Supp. 1488 (N.D. Ga. 1990). Compare Northeast
Georgia Radiological Ass'n v. Tidwell, 670 F.2d 507 (5th Cir. 1982) (upon
termination, bylaws give rise to property interest, making physicians able to
recover under Fourteenth Amendment Due Process Clause).

   [n75.] 891 F.2d 864 (11th Cir. 1990).

   [n76.] Id. at 867.

   [n77.] Id.

   [n78.] Id. at 869 (emphasis omitted).

   [n79.] Id. at 870.

   [n80.] Engelstad v. Virginia Mun. Hosp., 718 F.2d 262 (8th Cir. 1983).

   [n81.] Id.

   [n82.] Id.

   [n83.] Id.

   [n84.] Id. at 267.

   [n85.] Id. at 268.

   [n86.] Id. at 269.

   [n87.] 758 F. Supp. 1488 (N.D. Ga. 1990).

   [n88.] Id. at 1492.

   [n89.] Id.

   [n90.] Id. at 1492-93.

   [n91.] See, e.g., Datillo v. Tuscon Gen. Hosp., 533 P.2d 700 (Ariz. Ct. App.
1975); Desai v. St. Barnabas Medical Ctr., 510 A.2d 662 (N.J. 1986).

   [n92.] See id.

   [n93.] Compare Datillo, 533 P.2d 700 (Ariz. Ct. App. 1975) (holding that the
hospital's grant of exclusive contracts in nuclear medicine did not violate an
internist's due process rights because of the economic benefit to the hospital)
with Desai, 510 A.2d 662 (N.J. 1986) (holding that a requirement of association
prior to employment with current staff members did not serve a genuine public
health interest and was invalid). See also Lewin v. St. Joseph Hosp. of Orange
County, 146 Cal. Rptr. 892 (Cal. Ct. App. 1978).

   [n94.] 533 P.2d 700 (Ariz. Ct. App. 1975).

   [n95.] Id. at 706.

   [n96.] Id. at 704. See also Bennell v. City of Virginia, 104 N.W.2d. 633, 634
(Minn. 1960), where the Minnesota Supreme Court upheld the legality of a closed
staff in radiology because it was "in furtherance of the hospital's obligation
to operate and administer the hospital efficiently."

   [n97.] 146 Cal. Rptr. 892 (Cal. Ct. App. 1978).

   [n98.] Id. at 895.

   [n99.] Id. at 906.

   [n100.] Id.

   [n101.] See Mateo-Woodburn v. Fresno Community Hosp., 270 Cal. Rptr. 894
(Cal. Ct. App. 1990) (hospital board's decision to close anesthesiology
department and enter into an exclusive contract for anesthesiology services was
viewed as quasi-legislative, administration action); Redding v. St. Francis
Medical Ctr., 255 Cal. Rptr. 806 (Cal. Ct. App. 1989) (hospital decided to
permit only those cardiac surgeons under contract with hospital to perform
cardiac surgery procedures); Centeno v. Roseville Community Hosp., 167 Cal.
Rptr. 183, 189 (Cal. Ct. App. 1979) (because hospital would "channel all
radiological work through a single entity, there would be decreased costs to
patients through elimination of double purchases of expensive equipment").

   [n102.] See Berman v. Valley Hosp., 510 A.2d 673 (N.J. 1986) (holding that a
hiring policy with restrictions whose purpose was not supported by empirical
data was an invalid method of closing the departments); Desai v. St. Barnabas
Medical Ctr., 510 A.2d 662 (N.J. 1986) (holding that a requirement of
association prior to employment with current staff members did not serve a
genuine public health interest and was invalid); Greisman v. Newcomb Hosp., 192
A.2d 817 (N.J. 1963) (finding that if restriction denying staff membership was
done for a reason unrelated to public welfare, then policy was invalid).

   [n103.] 510 A.2d 662 (N.J. 1986).

   [n104.] Id. at 664 n.1.

   [n105.] Id. at 668.

   [n106.] Id.

   [n107.] Id. at 672.

   [n108.] Id. at 670.

   [n109.] Id. at 670.

   [n110.] Id.

   [n111.] Id. at 670-71.

   [n112.] 510 A.2d 673 (N.J. 1986).

   [n113.] Id. at 680.

   [n114.] See Dutta v. St. Francis Regional Medical Ctr., 850 P.2d 928 (Kan.
Ct. App. 1993) (deciding that employee who is replaced with an exclusive
provider has no right to hearing under hospital bylaws); Lewisburg Community
Hosp., 805 S.W.2d 756 (Tenn. 1991) (holding hospital breached bylaws when it
failed to grant radiologist hearing after termination of contract to provide
exclusive radiological services); Anne Arundel Gen. Hosp. v. O'Brien, 432 A.2d
483 (Md. Ct. Spec. App. 1981) (holding that hospital that changes exclusive
provider need not give hearing to ousted provider); Holt v. Good Samaritan Hosp.
and Health Ctr., 590 N.E.2d 1318 (Ohio Ct. App. 1990) (holding that physician
was not entitled to hearing under hospital bylaws when hospital contracted with
a different exclusive provider).

   [n115.] Dr. Stuer & Latham v. Nat'l Medical Enterprises, 672 F. Supp. 1489
(D.C. N.C. 1987), aff'd 846 F.2d 70 (4th Cir. 1988); Faucher, 891 F.2d at 864.

   [n116.] Lewisburg Community Hosp., 805 S.W.2d at 756.

   [n117.] Id.

   [n118.] Id. at 759.

   [n119.] See Posner v. Lankenau Hosp., 645 F. Supp. 1102, 1106 (E.D. Pa. 1986)
(under Pennsylvania law, hospital bylaws constitute contract between physician
and hospital) aff'd 865 F.2d 252 (3d Cir. Pa. 1988); Rees v. Intermountain
Healthcare, 808 P.2d 1069, 1073 n.3 (Utah 1991) (bylaws constitute a binding
contract between hospital and physician); Bartley v. Eastern Maine Medical Ctr.,
617 A.2d 1020, 1021 (Me. 1992) (bylaws of a private medical center may
constitute enforceable contract between the center and its staff physicians).

   [n120.] Gianetti, 557 A.2d at 1249; Manczur v. Southside Hosp., 183 N.Y.S.2d
960, 962 (1959); Munoz v. Flower Hosp., 507 N.E.2d 360, 364 (Ohio App. 1985).

   [n121.] 421 S.E.2d at 731.

   [n122.] Id. at 736 (citations omitted).

   [n123.] Id. at 737. Similarly, in Redding, 255 Cal. Rptr. at 806, 809-11, the
California Court of Appeals held that a physician had no "property right" to
remain on the medical staff. The court held that the hospital had the right to
make rational management decisions, even when the exercise of that right might
prove adverse to the interests of specific individual practitioners.

   [n124.] See Robles v. Humana Hosp. Cartersville, 785 F. Supp. 989, 1000-02
(N.D. Ga. 1992) (bylaws do not constitute a contract, and while an action may be
brought for injunctive relief to enforce the bylaws, a physician is not entitled
to bring an action for damages). This decision pre-dated the St. Mary's
decision. See also St. Mary's Hosp. of Athens, 421 S.E.2d at 737 (although
bylaws do not constitute a contract, nevertheless a physician may bring an
action in tort on the basis that the hospital "cannot abridge or refuse to
follow its existing bylaws concerning staff privileges . . . [and] the violation
of that duty is actionable"). Gianetti, 557 A.2d at 1249, 1255 (the court held
that bylaws were not a contract per se, but held that bylaws were subject to
judicial review and enforceable because of the relationship between the doctor
and the hospital and because the bylaws therein were statutorily mandated).

   [n125.] Lewisburgh Comm. Hosp. v. Alfredson, 805 S.W.2d 756 (Tenn. 1991); St.
Mary's Hosp. at Athens, 421 S.E.2d 737.

   [n126.] Bellam, 758 F. Supp. 1488; Mays, 582 F. Supp. at 425.

   [n127.] 617 A.2d 1020 (Me. 1992).

   [n128.] Id. at 1022.

   [n129.] Id.

   [n130.] Id. at 1023.

   [n131.] Id. at 1023 n.6.

   [n132.] See Bartley, 617 A.2d at 1020; Bellam v. Clayton County Hosp. Auth.,
758 F. Supp. 1488 (N.D. Ga. 1990); Mays, 582 F. Supp. at 425; Anne Arundel Gen.
Hosp., 432 A.2d at 483 (court upheld right of hospital to consolidate nuclear
medicine and radiology department and enter into exclusive contract with new
provider without providing any due process hearing under the bylaws. While Court
recognized bylaws have the force and effect of an enforceable contract, the due
process procedures did not apply because the hospital had not made a staff
privileges decision.)

   [n133.] Walsky v. Pascack Valley Hosp., 367 A.2d 1204 (1976); Stone v.
William Beaumont Hosp., 1983-2 Trade Cas. (CCH) P65,681 (E.D. Mich. 1983); Knapp
v. Palos Community Hosp., 465 N.E.2d 555 (Ill. App. 1989).

   [n134.] The case was discussed in a front-page article in the New York Times.
Although the article discussed the case in the context of economic
credentialing, the article primarily addressed the potential fraud and abuse
concerns by the Office of Inspector General of the Department of Health and
Human Services over alleged actions of hospitals requiring hospital-based
physicians to make certain payments in order to retain their contract. See
Robert Pear, U.S. Says Hospitals Demand Physicians Pay For Referrals, N.Y.
TIMES, Sept. 28, 1992, at A1.

   [n135.] Coffey, 955 F.2d at 1388; Univ. Emergency Physicians v. Richmond Co.
Hosp. Auth., 1982-83 Trade Cas. (CCH) P65,097 at 71, 149 (S.D. Ga. 1982).

   [n136.] Coffey, 955 F.2d at 1391.

   [n137.] University Emergency Physician, 1982-83 Trade Cas. (CCH) at 71,151.

   [n138.] For a more recent decision upholding the right of a hospital to
require full-time commitment by physicians to the hospital, see Katz v.
Children's Hosp. Corp., 602 N.E.2d 598 (Mass. App. Ct. 1992). There, the
Massachusetts Court of Appeals upheld the hospital's policy to prevent
physicians in department subspecialties from engaging in private practice. The
plaintiff gastroenterologists were reappointed as staff members, but because
they wanted to engage part-time in private practice, the hospital restricted
their use of hospital facilities. The court of appeals rejected their legal
challenge on the ground that the hospital's decision conformed to the bylaws
requirements.

   [n139.] 843 F.2d 139 (3d Cir. 1988), cert. denied, 488 U.S. 870 (1988).

   [n140.] After the first reversal the trial court again granted summary
judgment on the grounds that the hospital's decision was immune as lawful state
action. The Third Circuit again reversed the trial court's grant of summary
judgment to defendants on grounds that the hospital did not enjoy state action
immunity for its actions, based on the Supreme Court decision of Patrick v.
Burget. See Miller v. Indiana Hosp., 930 F.2d 334 (3d. Cir. 1991). On remand,
the district court for the third time granted summary judgment to the
defendants. This time the court held the plaintiff had failed to prove antitrust
injury because there was no evidence of any reduction in competition in a
properly defined relevant market. Miller v. Indiana Hosp., 1992-1 Trade Cas.
(CCH) P69,797 (W.D. Pa. 1992). This decision was affirmed by the Third Circuit
in Miller v. Indiana Hosp., 1992-2 Trade Cas. (CCH) P69,954 (3d Cir. 1992),
cert. denied, 113 S.Ct. 1366 (1993).

   [n141.] Miller, 843 F.2d at 145.

   [n142.] In another recent case, Tarabishi v. McAlester Regional Hosp., 951
F.2d 1558 (10th Cir. 1991), the court rejected the antitrust claims of a
physician who alleged he was terminated after attempting to establish an
outpatient surgical clinic that the hospital opposed. The court affirmed summary
judgment on the grounds that the plaintiff had failed to offer sufficient
evidence to demonstrate the market power of the hospital, any illegal
conspiracy, or any adverse impact on competition. For another case where the
plaintiff alleged a hospital denied privileges to physicians associated with a
competing hospital, see Potters Medical Ctr. v. City Hosp. Ass'n, 800 F.2d 568
(6th Cir. 1986).

   [n143.] See CALIF. JOINT COUNSEL supra note 12; see John D. Blum, Hospital
-Medical Staff Relations in the Face of Shifting Business Strategies: A Legal
Analysis, 14 UNIV. OF PUGET SOUND L. REV. 584-585 n.106 and 107.

   [n144.] See Katherine Benesch, Credentialing Criteria Puts Hospitals at Risk,
N.J.L.J. 10 (1993).

   [n145.] 465 N.E.2d 554 (Ill. App. Ct. 1984).

   [n146.] 488 N.E.2d 685 (Ill. App. Ct. 1986).

   [n147.] Hahn v. Oregon Physicians' Service, 868 F.2d 1022 (9th Cir. 1988),
cert. denied, 493 U.S. 846 (1989); Hassan v. Independent Practice Ass'n, 698 F.
Supp. 679 (E.D. Mich. 1988).

   [n148.] See Hahn, 868 F.2d 1022.

   [n149.] 698 F. Supp. at 679.

   [n150.] Id. at 694. In contrast, see Hahn v. Oregon Physicians' Service, 868
F.2d 1022 (9th Cir. 1988), cert. denied, 493 U.S. 846 (1989), where the Ninth
Circuit reversed summary judgment in favor of the defendants on a claim by
podiatrists that they were unlawfully excluded from participating in a health
plan, and consequently were reimbursed at a lower level than physicians. In
doing so, the court found a sufficient factual dispute over whether the
podiatrists had been excluded because of claims over-utilization.

   [n151.] Kelly, 692 P.2d at 1350; Jones, 533 N.Y.S.2d at 522; Stein v. TriCity
Hosp. Auth., 384 S.E.2d 430 (Ga. App. 1989) cert. denied, Sept. 29, 1989; Kling
v. St. Paul Fire and Marine Ins. Co., No. 85-1342 (C.D. Ill, 1987).

   [n152.] 692 P.2d at 1353-54.

   [n153.] 533 N.Y.S.2d at 524.

   [n154.] Todorov v. DCH Health Care Auth., 921 F.2d 1438 (11th Cir. 1991).

   [n155.] Id.

   [n156.] Id.

   [n157.] Id. at 1455-1457.

   [n158.] Id. at 1459.

   [n159.] Mary T. Koska, Hospitals and Medical Staffs: The Concept of Planning
Takes On New Meaning, HOSPITALS, Oct. 20, 1992, at 28.

   [n160.] 42 U.S.C.A. §§ 1201-17 (West Supp. 1993).

   [n161.] 42 U.S.C.A. § 20003 (West Supp. 1993). The Fifth Circuit in United
States v. Harris Methodist Fort Worth, 970 F.2d 94 (5th Cir. 1992), has also
recognized the applicability of Title VI, 42 U.S.C.A. § 2000d (West Supp. 1993),
to claims that hospitals receiving federal funds had discriminated in staff
privileges decisions.

   [n162.] 29 U.S.C.A. §§ 621-34 (West Supp. 1993).

   [n163.] 42 U.S.C.A. § 1981 (West Supp. 1993).

   [n164.] Treas. Reg. § 31.3401(c)-1(b)(amended 1970); see also, 26 C.F.R. §
31,3401(c)-1(b).

   [n165.] Pardazi v. Cullman Medical Ctr., 838 F.2d 1155 (11th Cir. 1988);
Gomez v. Alexian Bros. Hosp. of San Jose, 698 F.2d 1019 (9th Cir. 1988); Doe on
Behalf of Doe v. St. Joseph's Hosp., 788 F.2d 411 (7th Cir. 1986).

   [n166.] Pardazi, 838 F.2d at 1155; 42 U.S.C. § 2000e-2(a)(1)(1982).

   [n167.] Pardazi v. Cullman Medical Ctr. 702 F. Supp. 852 (N.D. Ala. 1988).

   [n168.] Pardazi, 838 F.2d at 1157.

   [n169.] Id. at 1156.

   [n170.] Id.

   [n171.] Gomez, 698 F.2d at 1019-1021.

   [n172.] Doe on Behalf of Doe, 788 F.2d at 411-423.

   [n173.] 488 F.2d 1338 (D.C. Cir. 1973).

   [n174.] 788 F.2d at 423 (footnote omitted).

   [n175.] See Pao v. Holy Redeemer Hosp., 547 F. Supp. 484 (E.D. Pa. 1982);
Zaklama v. Mount Sinai Medical Center, 842 F.2d 291 (11th Cir. 1988); Vakharia
v. Swedish Covenant Hosp., 765 F. Supp. 461 (N.D. Ill. 1991).

   [n176.] Mitchell v. Frank R. Howard Memorial Hosp., 853 F.2d 762 (9th Cir.
1988) cert. denied, 489 U.S. 1013 (1989); Diggs v. Hosp.-Methodist, 847 F.2d 270
(5th Cir. 1988) cert. denied, 488 U.S. 956 (1988).

   [n177.] Beverly v. Douglas, 591 F. Supp. 1321 (S.D.N.Y. 1984); Diggs, 847
F.2d at 270.

   [n178.] Beverly, 591 F. Supp. at 1321.

   [n179.] Id. at 1326; see also Sirides v. Reinhard, 613 F.2d 826, 832 (D.C.
Cir. 1979).

   [n180.] 613 F.2d 826 (D.C. Cir. 1979).

   [n181.] Id.

   [n182.] 847 F.2d 270 (5th Cir. 1988), cert. denied, 488 U.S. 956 (1988).

   [n183.] 29 U.S.C. § 623 (1988).

   [n184.] Menzel v. Western Auto Supply Co., 848 F.2d 327, 328 (1st Cir. 1988).

   [n185.] See Terbovitz v. Fiscal Court of Adair County, Ky., 825 F.2d 111, 114
(6th Cir. 1987).

   [n186.] Id. at 115.

   [n187.] See Mitchell v. Toledo Hosp., 964 F.2d 577 (6th Cir. 1992); Blumberg
v. HCA Management Co., Inc., 848 F.2d 642 (5th Cir. 1988), cert denied, 488 U.S.
1007 (1989); De La Garza Blizzard v. Sociedad Espanola, 787 F. Supp. 31 (D.P.R.
1992), aff'd 996 F.2d 724 (1st Cir. 1992).

   [n188.] Patel v. Lutheran Medical Ctr., 775 F. Supp. 592 (E.D.N.Y. 1991);
Nobler v. Beth Israel Medical Ctr., 702 F. Supp. 1023 (S.D.N.Y. 1988); Mallarl
v. St. Luke's Hosp. of Bethleheim, 699 F. Supp. 1127 (E.D. Penn. 1988); Gaynor
v. Ephrate Community Hosp., 690 F. Supp. 373 (E.D. Penn. 1988); Kuck v. Bensen,
649 F. Supp. 68 (D.Me. 1986); Nanavati v. Burdette Tomlin Memorial Hosp., 1986
WL 15318 (D.N.J. 1986).

   [n189.] 765 F. Supp. 461 (N.D. Ill 1991).

   [n190.] Id. at 468.

   [n191.] 29 U.S.C. § 623 (1988).

   [n192.] Rombough v. F.A.A., 594 F.2d 893 (2nd Cir. 1979).

   [n193.] 42 U.S.C.A. § 12112(a)(West Supp. 1992).

   [n194.] See Doe v. Mercy Health Corp. of Southeastern Pa., No. 92-6711 (E.D.
Pa. filed Nov. 23, 1992). According to the allegations, the hospital learned
from a colleague of the plaintiff's that the plaintiff was infected with HIV.
The hospital then requested that he not perform surgery, but did so without
consulting any expert review panel, local health officials, or without obtaining
any information that the plaintiff posed a significant risk to his patients. The
hospital then notified over 1,000 patients that the doctor who had participated
in their surgical procedure had tested HIV-positive, noting that the risk of HIV
transmission was "extremely remote." Although the hospital did not disclose the
plaintiff's identity in either the notification letter or the press conference
it held to inform the public about the situation, the plaintiff alleges that the
press, co-workers, patients and friends quickly learned his identity shortly
thereafter. He claims hospital officials suspended his clinical privileges, and
his patient referrals from the members of the medical staff "dropped to zero,"
and that his name was dropped from the hospital's telephone referral line. The
plaintiff alleges that in July of 1992, the Board restored his surgical
privileges on the condition that he inform each prospective patient of his HIV
infection prior to performing invasive procedures. The plaintiff claims that
such a requirement effectively prevents him from continuing to maintain an
economically viable practice.

   [n195.] Id.

   [n196.] HIV-Infected Doctor Charges Hospital Restrictions Illegally
Discriminate, 1 HEALTH L. REP (BNA) 381, (Dec. 17, 1992).

   [n197.] In re Westchester County Medical Center HHS, Civil Rights Reviewing
Authority, No. 1357 (Sept. 29, 1992), 1 HEALTH L. REP. (BNA) 97. In that case
the administrative law judge ruled that the pharmacist, whose duties included
filling prescriptions for IV medications, did not constitute a direct threat to
the health or safety of others or pose a significant risk of communicating HIV
to employees or patients. Therefore, the hospital was found liable for handicap
discrimination when it denied him employment because he was HIV-positive. The
administrative judge also held the hospital's offer to employ him subject to
certain restrictions was also discriminatory because it denied him opportunities
for higher earnings and promotions.

   [n198.] 29 U.S.C. § 794(a)(1988).

   [n199.] Id; 42 U.S.C.A. § 12101-17 (West Supp. 1992).

   [n200.] 2 HEALTH L. REP. (BNA) 61 (Jan. 23, 1993).

   [n201.] Stephanie Trudeau, Disabilities Act Can Affect Medical Staff
Appointment Process, 10 HEALTH LAW NEWSLETTER, No. 3 (Jan. 1993)(hereinafter
Trudeau Article)

   [n202.] Appendix to Part 1630 - Interpretative Guidance on Title I of the
Americans with Disabilities Act, § 1630.2(a)-(c)(West Supp. 1992).

   [n203.] 42 U.S.C.A. § 12112(d)(2)(4)(West Supp. 1992).

   [n204.] 42 U.S.C.A. § 12112(d)(3)(West Supp. 1992).

   [n205.] Id.

   [n206.] Id.

   [n207.] Id.

   [n208.] The term disability as defined by the ADA also does not include
transvestitism, transsexualism, pedophilia, exhibitionism, voyeurism, or other
sexual behavior disorders, compulsive gambling, kleptomania, pyromania,
homosexuality, or bisexuality.

   [n209.] 42 U.S.C.A. § 12112(d)(3)(B)(West Supp. 1992).

   [n210.] See Trudeau supra note 135. See also, the comments to the regulations
which provide the example that if an employee suddenly starts to use increased
amounts of sick leave or starts to appear ill, an employer could only require
medical tests for certain diseases if the employer can demonstrate that such
testing is job-related and consistent with a business necessity.

   [n211.] 42 U.S.C.A. § 12111(9)(West Supp. 1992). The ADA defines "reasonable
accommodation" as any modification or adjustment to a job application process or
work environment that enables a qualified individual with a disability to be
considered for the position or perform the essential functions of the position,
and which will not impose an "undue hardship" on the employer's business. A
"reasonable accommodation" may include making existing facilities usable by
individuals with disabilities, job restructuring, modified work schedules,
acquisition or modification of equipment or devices, appropriate adjustment of
policies, provision of qualified readers or interpreters, and other similar
accommodations.

   [n212.] See AHA Advisory, Aug. 21, 1992, reported at American Health Lawyers
Association Urges Testing of Employees, DOCS, HEALTH L. REP. (BNA) 53 (Sept. 24,
1992).


